_	"Easing punitive measures…will only embolden Russia," encourage North Korea and Iran to follow them and send the message that all they need to do is "wait it out," Power argued.
_	Labour Party councillor Peter Kane, who won the seat, claimed that with the failure of the NNP "the Kingstanding people are sending out the message that we are a community which will solve problems together."
_	Soon their suspicions are confirmed as their father hijacks radio and TV transmissions to relay the message that unless a certain Senator who canceled his United States Department of Defense contracts is handed over, the city of Washington D.C will suffer the consequences.
_	Coupling a convincing "Partners Against Pain" campaign with an incentivized bonus system, Purdue trained its salesforce to convey the message that the risk of addiction was under one percent, ultimately influencing the prescribing habits of the medical professionals that attended these conferences.
_	The song's lyrics have been interpreted by one reviewer to be conveying the message that "love is the answer to loneliness" and "that connection is the antidote to unreality."
_	The angels had the claws of birds instead of hands and feet, and they were dressed in surplices of white linen and tight pants, and they pulled the Devil's food away from the children's hands, cried tears as big as peas, and asked them to confess so the witches could be exterminated and send the message that one should not have to work on Thursdays, nor use shirts with frilled sleeves, and not have to sell tobacco above its fairest price.
_	It also conveyed the message that the Amiga computer line was "user friendly" as a pun or play on words.
_	This treaty was used to send the message that treaties are still relevant and should be honored.
_	Truman's supporters in Congress first distanced themselves from the argument, then spread the message that Truman disavowed it as well.
_	She praised Winfrey for sending the message that blacks and women have value.
_	In 2014, Embarcadero removed the BDE installer from its Rad Studio XE7 install, making it a separate download in order to strengthen the message that the BDE has been deprecated for a number of years.
_	Meanwhile, Mughal reinforcements in the shape of war-vessels and imperial officers ("Omraos") reached Ram Singh, along with the Mughal admiral, Munnawar Khan and the Mughal Viceroy Shaista Khan, sent the message that Ram Singh was sent to fight the Assamese, not make friends with them.
_	A spammer, knowing that he's sending to a C/R using system, could design his message so that his "spam payload" is in the part of the message that the challenge message includes.
_	On 23 November, "U-68" received the message that "Atlantis" had been sunk by while resupplying under the command of "Kapitänleutnant" Ernst Bauer.
_	Blaetz points out that this sends the message that "women and war do not mix", alluding to the idea that in World War I women should stay behind the front lines, but still be supportive of those at war.
_	Activists using the slogan will often explain that their ultimate goal in a militant, provocative slogan of this type is to get across the message that, like anti-racism and anti-sexism, they want to purge pity from worldwide social discourse on disability, at both the governmental and cultural levels, and instead foster disability-inclusive practices and equal power politics.
_	Clifford J. Levy said that while the school in Brooklyn where his children previously attended had an "everyone’s-a-winner ethos" NHS had the message that "learning is hard, but you have to do it.
_	It was intended to convey the message that, despite all the concerts being performed in one location, they would be easily accessible to fans from all parts of the country.
_	Around one-third of those behaviors were explicitly rewarded in the plot, potentially sending the message that these acts of prosocial behavior can come with positive consequences.
_	It's tragically past time to send the message that priests can't do anything they want and hide their sins behind special privilege," and credited Philadelphia and District Attorney Williams with starting to send that message.
_	Described as "a young charismatic prophet", Angel travels by helicopter to preach the message that God wants his flock to be rich, as rich as he is.
_	All of the anti-tax revolts were crushed with ferocious brutality by the Crown to send the message that it was folly on the part of ordinary people to challenge the might of the French state.
_	The Tomahawk was a resounding success in its true purpose: to generate media buzz, and send the message that Chrysler was a bold, ambitious company, unafraid to take risks.
_	On January 16, 2005, the "New York Times" reported internal Social Security Administration documents directing employees to disseminate the message that "Social Security's long-term financing problems are serious and need to be addressed soon", and to "insert solvency messages in all Social Security publications".
_	In the hardcover edition, the code for "Eoin Colfer Artemis Fowl The Eternity Code Puffin" is printed on the spine underneath the dustjacket, allowing the reader to decipher the code inside the book, which is a message from Artemis asking the reader to help him regain his memories by spreading the message that "Artemis Fowl must find Mulch Diggums
_	She claimed that the rejection of Kanji's sexuality "sends the message that homosexuality is shameful and should not be accepted."
_	Enthusiastic new members spread the message that the 13-year-old Rawat could reveal God.
_	In 2017, youths in Tarai Madhes National Council observed Black Day to protest the constitution to give the message that the resistance over the Constitution of Nepal continues.
_	Poirot and Hastings are in their rooms with a neighbour, Dr Hawker, when the medical man's housekeeper arrives with the message that a client, Count Foscatini, has phoned for the doctor, crying out for help.
_	The song may be seen as discussing self-help, with the message that it is the "course of a lifetime", but the help that is actually "offered" in the song is tongue-in-cheek, with lines like "How to lie to yourself and thereby to everyone else" and "How to control someone to be a carbon copy of you."
_	However, where the objective is to attract and influence public opinion, the message that is most likely to succeed is not necessarily the same as the political view that principally motivated the defendants.
_	The film shows the life after for AIDS patients and gives the message that, society should be kind to AIDS patients and consider them as normal humans.
_	"Go to every corner of Pakistan and give the message that this is the time to sacrifice," Iftikhar Muhammad Chaudhry, who is under virtual house arrest in Islamabad, told lawyers by mobile phone.
_	Imams and officials have come out to repeat the message that Islam is a religion of peace and has nothing to do with the terrorists in the aftermath of the November 2015 Paris attacks.
_	He later on received the message that Zhao Ziyang had already been deposed and martial law was imminent in Beijing.
_	For example, the message that ed will produce in case of error, or when it wants to make sure the user wishes to quit without saving, is "?".
_	Non-verbal phatic expressions are used without spoken utterances to emphasize or add detail to the message that a person conveys or expresses.
_	The unions ended up staging job action and public information campaigns, with the message that they did not want people and business to use postal codes on their mail.
_	Screens that display at equivalent points are considered "Game over" screens, even if the message that is displayed is entirely different, such as "YOU ARE DEAD" (seen in "Resident Evil", among others) or "GOOD NIGHT" (seen in the Klonoa series, Luigi's Mansion, and among others).
_	In contemporary times, it is used in varied contexts in South Africa to show solidarity in sporting events and other national events to relay the message that the players are not alone and are part of a team.
_	Actions have included demonstrating against the 2003 invasion of Iraq, picketing the World Health Organization conference with the message that capitalism saves lives, throwing powdered chalk on The Yes Men after The Yes Men failed in an attempt to infiltrate the Cato Institute, and demonstrating at the movie Sicko to protest against socialized healthcare.
_	It was created by Leonard Knight to convey the message that "God Loves Everyone".
_	They were inspired by night marches which had taken place in Germany with the message that women should be able to walk at night without fear.
_	The beginning of the process towards understanding speech is first hearing the message that is spoken.
_	By the 1940s, "Italian" was dropped, in order to convey the message that its message was not just restricted to Italians.
_	According to them, many gang members were involved in violent crime for status and sexual attractiveness, and the strike sent the message that refusing to turn in the guns was not sexy.
_	Stewart also fired back at Joe Scarborough by telling Cramer to relay the message that the nature of "The Daily Show"s satire is not to be fair.
_	Just when all seems hopeless, the message that Resistance leader Juliet Parrish sent into space at the end of the original miniseries is finally heard.
_	Ryan was sent to Wexford by Eoin MacNeill with the message that there would be no Rising.
_	[4] Komar also got the message that the principle of life must be like water.
_	He also works as a motivational speaker and seeks to get out the message that if he can control his diabetes in the most unlikely conditions, no one should feel hindered by diabetes.
_	During the campaign, government-controlled media repeated the message that if the Karimov-era autocracy ended, the only alternatives were political chaos or Islamic extremism.
_	The maltreated creature symbolizes the plight of Zoroaster's community, and the soul of the primordial beast is a metaphor for the message that Zoroaster has received from Mazda.
_	And they would interfere with the message that Prime Minister Netanyahu and previous Israeli governments have sent for the last two decades of a profound commitment to a negotiated two-state solution that will require compromise by both sides.
_	In order to keep her from hurting herself further, Rei challenges her to a fight and easily beats her senseless, driving home the message that her current mindset and skills do her no good in their quest of hunting down Ring.
_	He said “Size and sweat interest no one, what matters are the message that it can give and the impact it creates.”
_	Wuzhu got the message that his reinforcements led by Taiyi would arrive at Zhenzhou, so he ordered the army back to Huangtiandang.
_	Andrew Cowan, next on the scene, also slowed but was waved through with the message that everything was under control.
_	From the beginning of 1939, Anti-Semitic messages were constantly broadcast with the aim of spreading the message that there was a very real and dangerous Jewish conspiracy against the German people.
_	It is thought that Murat wanted to send the message that Mustafa was not his genuine uncle (although he was) but an impostor.
_	It is an offense to possess, produce, copy, import, or export pornography involving a child under 16 years of age, or to publish or cause to be published any advertisement that conveys or is likely to be understood as conveying the message that any person has published, publishes, or intends to publish any child pornography.
_	A photo spread and article on Gallozzi-La Placa Gallery, in Italian Vogue magazine from 1984, showed the partners standing inside a loft style studio surrounded by graffiti works in progress, sending the message that the gallerists were part of the scene, not just on the exhibitor side, but on the production side as well.
_	"Into the Cold" communicates the message that there will be no bicentennial expedition to the North Pole due to the rapidly vanishing polar ice cap.
_	The Sacrament of Transition actively proselytizes to heroin addicts with the message that ibogaine can help them.
_	As H. W. Janson comments, the sculpture conveys the message that "they knew how to die, barbarians that they were".
_	When the song begins in earnest, it conveys the message that the singer's true love may be in Atlantis.
_	He regains his limbs and prays to Lord Panduranga to grant him the boon of merging into him along with his parents — giving the message that one has to serve one's parents and it is the quickest way to Salvation.
_	She spoke of visions and messages from God, claiming that she had received a vision from God the message that celibacy and confession of sin are the only true road to salvation and the only way in which the Kingdom of God could be established on the earth.
_	This merchant, according to legend, while passing through the main road running in front of the above church, received the message that he would lose a substantial amount of money in his business.
_	Opposite the god is rendered a black bird, for which several explanations have been offered: it is identified either as a plain oracular bird or as a crow which brought to Apollo the message that his beloved Koronis, daughter of king Phlegyas, was getting married.
_	The Poet pushed the message that the boy should marry a woman and have a child, so that the Fair Youth could stay young in the tender form of the Youth's own son.
_	The nightclub celebrated its fifth anniversary in September 1996 in numerous different ways, the most notorious being the projecton of their logo onto Buckingham Palace with the message that the Ministry of Sound "lasts longer than a royal marriage," in reference to Prince Charles and Princess Diana's divorce.
_	Tony, realizing that Phil was sending the message that New York can do whatever they want, decided to hurt Phil financially as payback for Vito.
_	The men loaded a six-pound cannon and ammunition on the steamboat and set out to deliver the message that the Sauk and Fox were fleeing the U.S. forces.
_	Everything is much easier to find and children are no longer being sent the message that science and adventure are only for boys, crafts and nurturing play only for girls”.
_	Thinking he is dead, the authorities publicize the message that Juan Carlos is dead.
_	In piano ballad "Special", Jackson speaks to her inner child, spreading the message that "pain is not permanent", but rather, transformed.
_	Justin casually reveals his sexual orientation to Callie, conveying the message that coming out has become increasingly normalized in young people’s lives.
_	Some parents give their children presents for Children's Day – however, Save the Children try to spread the message that it doesn't matter if a parent can't afford to buy their child a present, as the real aim of Children's Day is for parents and children to spend the day together, and work together to reconcile their problems.
_	For example, at a Women's Institute meeting, a disapproving look might convey the message that it is inappropriate to flirt with the minister.
_	Decoding is the processes that the viewer interprets the message that the source sent.
_	He later told Benedict that it was his duty to spread the message that the Jewish people belong in the Land of Israel.
_	Indie Vision Music's Lee Brown evoked that the listener would "come for the addictive and memorable guitar licks with slightly pop-infused catchiness, but you’ll stay for the message that sits behind it."
_	This will ensure that the Israelis get the message that it is revenge for the killing of her new husband (and Boaz's role).
_	"Similar to the first game, we tried really hard to instill a sense of thematic cogency with our picks that the message that is coming through the licensed tracks," Thomas said, adding that blues and religious music were important to the sequel's themes, and that while the first game had used more commercial pop music, they wanted a broader range.
_	Langston Hughes’ poem, “Youth,” puts forth the message that Negro youth have a bright future, and that they should rise together in their self-expression and seek freedom.
_	The objective of the pieces is to assist in enhancing the public and political awareness of the actions that could have a significant impact on global emissions growth and to disseminate the message that it is time to act hence a new UN climate treaty will be developed in December 2009.
_	Collett has always tried to "send out the message that you don’t have to be a size six to be a model" and that she wants to promote a healthy body image for girls and women.
_	By then the message that Songhai was sending Mali was clear indeed; if the mansa could not hold onto his provinces, Songhai would.
_	"I Can't Give Everything Away" contains the line ""Seeing more and feeling less / Saying no but meaning yes / This is all I ever meant / That's the message that I sent"", which led Neil McCormick of "The Daily Telegraph" to think of the song as a point where "Bowie sounds like he is grappling with his own mystery."
_	TCP makes use of non-traditional approaches like art, performance and educational programs to reduce social stigma and relay the message that condoms save lives.
_	A line from the song "Blossom and Blood" appeared in the message that got flashed on infected computers by the worm WANK:
_	It has been noted that "EastEnders" were attempting to spread the message that abusive relationships are transmitted from one generation to the next within this storyline.
_	They give us the message that they can get around it by doing what they want.
_	“He has that one-of-a-kind harmony and rhythm that added to the message that would touch the soul.
_	These newer tales are also written in conventions of Western rather than Native American literature thus conveying the message that native storytellers' ability or style is inferior.
_	Sinestro accesses the message that Sur left him, learns of the Manhunters, Sector 666, the Five Inversions, and Sur's demise, and realizes that Atrocitus is on Earth.
_	In general, fish consumption advice attempts to convey the message that fish is a good source of nutrition and has significant health benefits, but that consumers, in particular pregnant women, women of child-bearing age, nursing mothers, and young children, should avoid fish with high levels of methylmercury, limit their intake of fish with moderate levels of methylmercury, and consume fish with low levels of methylmercury no more than twice a week.
_	Its image of the big man and the little man encompasses many of the finer things about Rugby League – the mateship after battle, the satisfaction of the shared experience on the playing field – no matter how hard and tough the struggle has been, the message that Rugby League, for all its professionalism, is still a game.
_	She almost becomes insane on that loss, this character is later used to convey the message that whether it is an accident or an abortion, the trauma of losing a child for a woman is the same.
_	Animal welfare statements essentially carry the message that the way farm animals have been reared, transported and slaughtered exceeds the animal welfare standards required by law.
_	After the meeting, Philip ordered the tree cut down and hacked to pieces, sending the message that he would offer no quarter to the English.
_	However, the village was captured before the scheduled bombardment but the message that it had been captured, delivered by a pigeon named G.I. Joe, of the U.S. Army Pigeon Service, managed to arrive in time to avoid the bombing, after having flown 20 miles in 20 minutes.
_	Right before their next tour in summer, Weitz got the message that he was accepted to his first choice graduate school in Arizona.
_	These feminists see prostitution as a form of slavery, and say that, far from decreasing rape rates, prostitution leads to a sharp "increase" in sexual violence against women, by sending the message that it is acceptable for a man to treat a woman as a sexual instrument over which he has total control.
_	This, however, does not mean that the process of foreign grade interpretation cannot be organized in an efficient, expedient way based on a thorough effort to understand the message that [foreign grades] carry.
_	Although a hellenizer, Saint Cosmas of Aetolia is still highly regarded by Orthodox Albanians for the message that he gave.
_	It tells a love story, with the message that "once you start feeling something for someone, after that first sight, it’s very difficult to go back and forget it, so you want to go deep with that story".
_	The last verse of the text gives the message that: "Anyone who trusts these instructions spoken by Narada and is convinced by them will be blessed with devotion and attain the most dear Lord.
_	There was therefore a need to publicly define the policy and reinforce the message that the Federal Republic would not accept any other states maintaining diplomatic relations with both the Federal Republic of Germany and the ("so-called")
_	He argued that the majority's interpretation of the word "seizure" was a radical departure from the Court's earlier Fourth Amendment jurisprudence and that the officers' demands to halt "adequately conveyed the message that respondent was not free to leave."
_	He then sends Flora who witnessed this to Baines with the severed finger wrapped in cloth, with the message that if Baines ever attempts to see Ada again, he will chop off more fingers.
_	The film shows struggle in the wretchedness of everyday life in the Balkans, with the message that love triumphs over adversity.
_	The name conveyed the message that the ensemble was no longer a Northern orchestra - it was an orchestra based in the North.
_	Before Serebryakov can make his announcement, Yelena conveys to Sonya the message that Astrov doesn’t love her.
_	Recently, the traveler's dilemma was tested with decision undertaken in groups rather than individually, in order to test the assumption that groups decisions are more rational, delivering the message that, usually, two heads are better than one.
_	A move that was made to shield the defense while sending the message that AEL did not returned to Super League just to remain, but to star.
_	The demonstrators were met with this opposition because of the message that they were trying to get across and because of the usage of the city’s public space.
_	Unfortunately, radical non-Afghan salafists became involved, executing some 60 surrendering Communists, cutting their corpses into small pieces, and sending the remains back to the besieged city in a truck with the message that this would be the fate awaiting the infidels.
_	Matthew Bulger of "The Humanist" notes that the creators of the series are trying to communicate the message that we need to focus on human relationships and not preoccupy our minds with unanswerable questions, in order to find a sense of purpose and live a better life.
_	"It sends out the message that you can make a living out of something – soft pornography – that is regarded by the Church as sinful, and yet you can be awarded for it.
_	As with many Oasis songs (such as "Whatever", "Acquiesce", "Live Forever") it sends the message that "everything's gonna be okay".
_	SGCM does prevent the specific "weak key" attack described in its paper, however there are other ways of modifying the message that will achieve the same forgery probability against SGCM as is possible against GCM: by modifying a valid "n"-word message, you can create a SGCM forgery with probability circa .
_	He faults the Palestinian Authority for being unwilling to negotiate with Israel, as well as the European states which unilaterally recognized a Palestinian state, thus sending the message that "the Palestinian Authority can sit in a government with terrorists and incite violence against Israel without paying any price."
_	They sent the message that Israel do all in its power to help them leave the Soviet Union.
_	One critic of HA is Cindi Love, the executive director of Soulforce, who states that "the message that homosexuality can be 'repaired' doesn't just ruin lives – it ends them".
_	Anti-prostitution feminists argue that when a society accepts prostitution it sends the message that it is irrelevant how the woman feels during sex or what the consequences of sex will be for her, and that it is acceptable for a man to engage in sexual activity with a woman who does not enjoy it and who could be mentally and emotionally forcing herself in order to be able to cope; the normalization of such one sided sexual encounters might negatively affect the way men relate to women in general and might increase sexual violence against women.
_	Only after she received the message that he had fallen, did she slowly let herself be convinced by John Cunlight, to finally marry him.
_	With Sora, Nomura wants to give players the message that even though they are not "important people", they have the opportunity to accomplish great things.
_	These attacks are referred to as the Taliban’s ferocious response to US President Trump’s new strategy of war, an increased pace of aerial bombardments targeting Taliban and Islamic State Militants, giving the message that the Taliban can strike at will, even in the capital city, Kabul.
_	Braithwaite felt that the title "Higher Than Hope" was highly consistent with the message that both he and Hussey were endeavoring to convey with the song, namely the notion of, as Braithwaite describes, going beyond "just wishing about" the resolution of conflict, "like a...I guess, very idealistic [song], in a sense."
_	The core concept behind the video, which Milk described as his most complex narrative, was to take various deplorable characters and merge them with biblical iconography in order convey the message that God is with them.
_	Destroying captured enemy munitions conveys the message that they were either not needed...or not wanted.
_	These innovations are marketed with the message that they help consumers achieve the best shave as easily as possible.
_	The article "Religious Heritage and Teenage Marriage" suggests that many religions such as Pentecostalism, Fundamentalist Christianity, and other institutionalized sects give the message that leads parents and teens to view early marriage as the only acceptable means of culminating romantic relationships.
_	Aguinaldo sent a ranking member of his staff to Ellwell Otis, the U.S. military commander, with the message that the firing had been against his orders.
_	In the end it was decided that he should exploit James's fears; the three original commissioners were sent back to James with the message that William felt he could no longer guarantee the king's well-being and that James for his own safety had better leave London for Ham.
_	Another method involves the therapist giving patients hypnotic suggestions during a head massage, with the message that alcohol will cause blindness or paralysis.
_	They sent a special envoy to Rome with the message that, "For the Hungarians there arises the problem either of letting the Germans pass, or opposing them with force.
_	In an open letter published in "The Guardian" on 26 April 2008, Anas al-Tikriti, Yvonne Ridley, Ihtisham Hibatullah, Ismail Patel and Roshan Salih — maintaining that their views are more representative of that of the UK Muslim community and stating that Quilliam has no grassroots support among British Muslims — argued that that UK foreign policy, in particular support for pro-Western dictators and occupation of Muslim lands, is a major cause of Islamic radicalisation and that it is Quilliam's intention to divert attention from that fact and deliver to society the message that "the powers that be" wish to be hear.
_	The video is strongly connected to the song delivering the message that everything is possible in this world if you only believe.
_	Chief Left Hand and his people got the message that only those Indians that reported to Fort Lyon would be considered peaceful and all others would be considered hostile and ordered killed.
_	According to Brush, it was "the only occasion in which Americans abandoned a major combat base due to enemy pressure" and in the aftermath, the North Vietnamese began a strong propaganda campaign, seeking to exploit the US withdrawal and to promote the message that the withdrawal had not been by choice.
_	Following the success of FashionValet, Vivy Yusof launched dUCk to convey the message that wearing scarves should be a celebrated act among women, whether Muslim or not.
_	Although Betty thinks nothing of it, the episode ends with Henry receiving the message that Betty had left him, inviting him to Hilda's upcoming wedding as her date.
_	These feminists see prostitution as a form of slavery, and say that, far from decreasing rape rates, prostitution leads to a sharp "increase" in sexual violence against women, by sending the message that it is acceptable for a man to treat a woman as a sexual instrument over which he has total control.
_	On the issue of the growing unrest, the MHP produced a short video showing AKP and HDP politicians making false statements and contradicting themselves, in order to give the message that the MHP had been right to oppose the solution process after all.
_	According to the United States Department of State, Chávez wanted to "send the message that the military was not a force of popular repression, but rather a force for development and security".
_	Ray's basic theme in the film is the message that the detachment of India's ruling classes assisted a small number of British officials and soldiers to take over Awadh without opposition.
_	Matalon stated to Ynet that the video was dedicated to the open culture of Tel Aviv, with the message that Tel Aviv is a city of freedom and love.
_	McMullin therefore assumes that the event was held in order to direct the fear in the population to these six deceased people who had been enemies of the hokke branch of the Fujiwara family, sending the message that enemies of the hokke Fujiwara were enemies of the people.
_	I only want to spread the message that Muslims should be allowed to leave Islam behind without being threatened".
_	Following the publication of the declaration, the British dispatched Commander David George Hogarth to see Hussein in January 1918 bearing the message that the "political and economic freedom" of the Palestinian population was not in question.
_	Despite this, Godoy picked oranges from the outside of Elvas and sent them to the Queen of Spain with the message that he would proceed to Lisbon.
_	Achieve an understanding of the message that has captured the imagination of a generation."
_	Callaghan intended to convey the message that he had not promised an election, but most observers misread his message as an assertion that he would call an election, and the Conservatives would not be ready for it.
_	I know the message that I want to send out, and I know the music I want to do.
_	However, by 1 January 2010, the "Our Water Our Future" website still displayed the message that the savings would be released "before the end of 2009".
_	He used many different techniques to convey the message that he wanted to get across.
_	"Thanks to [Nottinghamshire's] police force listening to local women's organisations, women and girls in Nottingham will receive the message that this kind of behaviour isn't normal or acceptable, that support is available, and that the problem will be taken seriously."
_	He returns with the message that the plague will end only after the murderer of Laius has been exposed and punished.
_	Suren was sent back with the message that Rome was unwilling to negotiate and would launch a tripartite invasion of Persia the following spring in 377.
_	Armand receives the message that Manon wishes to see him the next day, when Lilaque leaves.
_	Abdul Rahim Ayobi, a member of parliament from Kandahar, said the shooting "gives us the message that now the American soldiers are out of the control of their generals."
_	He came back to Béziers with the message that the town would be spared provided it would hand over their heretics.
_	American newspaper Latin Times said that the music video is "brilliant, vibrant, family friendly, fun, contagious and sends the message that music can bring people together from all over the world."
_	Pinedo returned and had put down the mutiny with the assistance of the British schooner "Rapid" when on 3 January HMS "Clio" appeared off Port Louis and delivered the message that the UK intended to re-assert sovereignty over the islands.
_	As the speed of planes increased this resulted in a plane reaching its destination before the message that it was on its way arrived at the airfield.
_	Gold said of the motivation for the film that "I'm optimistic that finally the message that this is real, that human beings are the cause of the most recent warming trend, and that it's an important issue, that message is actually reaching America.
_	As stated, many films pushed the message that criminals were the result of a poor moral and economic society, and many are portrayed as having foreign backgrounds or coming from the lower class.
_	Shannon's entropy measures the information contained in a message as opposed to the portion of the message that is determined (or predictable).
_	According to biographer Bernard Violet, the video provides the message that "women love to sometimes turn into a sexual object, but they still have their pride", and compares the end of the video to the film "Basic Instinct".
_	Smits also took on an increasing campaigning and advocacy role, to make the plight of the orangutan and its habitat more widely known, along with the message that something could - and was - being done.
_	According to the United States Department of State, Chávez wanted to "send the message that the military was not a force of popular repression, but rather a force for development and security".
_	She improvised a story and told them that a courier had arrived in Linköping with the message that the British fleet had come to Sweden's rescue, and that a Swedish army of 20,000 soldiers was on its way.
_	When we think about this case, we need to think about the message that we are sending to our children and our grandchildren.
_	The subordinate immediately acknowledges the receipt of the message that requests the accomplishment of the delegated operation (without yet starting to accomplish the delegated operation itself).
_	It conveys the message that it intended, but nothing goes overboard and things are never preachy.
_	However, he later received and decoded the message that the "PT-109" was missing, and dispatched Solomon Islander scouts Biuku Gasa and Eroni Kumana in dugout canoes to find the crew.
_	Finally, on a humorous note, the film carried across the message that hardships and people's discomfort with life exist everywhere as shown by the two complaining taxi drivers both in Moscow and in New York.
_	Kawai has had a say in the message that "Hamtaro" promoted, which was non-violence, teamwork, cooperation and sharing.
_	The score of "Plus-Minus" is complicated, delivering the message that composing serial music is hard work .
_	The film concludes with the message that the air forces responsible for helping to win World War II are now leading the world in peaceful enterprise: in short, that "air power is peace power".
_	Sanjayan also co-led the launch of "Nature is Speaking," Conservation International's award-winning campaign that features Julia Roberts, Harrison Ford, Liam Neeson and Penelope Cruz, among others, and delivers the message that people need nature to survive.
_	He further commented, "We think that child pornography, in any form, promotes values and sends the message that it is OK to sexually abuse children.
_	The middle eight delivers the message that this "can hurt you", and that "that is not what you are here for."
_	During the entire second song the author describes the waiting of Cosmas' mother Neda and the message that she receives of her sons decease.
_	He also believed the incarnation of Christ conveyed the message that a new state of harmony is possible.
_	The band's name originates from the message that the Commodore 64 computer outputs as a response to the LOAD command.
_	The penultimate verse reinforces the message that adherence to God and His Torah is the only worthwhile pursuit.
_	William III is said to have received the message that Napoleon I and his troops had crossed the Rhine whilst on the Epprechtstein.
_	Kevin Manley (Skeet Ulrich), a Los Angeles travel agent, receives the message that his grandpa has passed and left everything to him.
_	She plans to rid the hotel of the slugs, until Gavin relays the message that Linwood wants Angel and the others to die for the torment he was put through.
_	The song references Sir-Mix-A-Lot's single, "Baby Got Back", which also refers to women's butts, giving the message that if you don't have a "fat" one, you are not wanted.
_	He explained that the equinox is a symbol of the Manifestations of God, who include Jesus, Muhammad, the Báb and Bahá'u'lláh among others, and the message that they proclaim is like a spiritual springtime, and that Naw-Rúz is used to commemorate it.
_	The nature of the message that Egyptian propaganda conveyed during the crisis over Jordanian accession to the Baghdad pact is very significant.
_	They brought the message that the castle would be defended until the last breath.
_	But if anything sends the message that Muslims cannot express themselves through political processes, and they will not be dealt with like others, it will give more strength to the fringes within the community who say democracy and the political system doesn't apply to Muslims in this country.
_	Macklemore & Ryan Lewis teamed up with Mary Lambert to make "Same Love", a song about same sex marriage that focused on the message that love conquers all.
_	Heo Jun conveyed the message that maintaining the body’s energies in balance leads to one’s good health.
_	The goal was to send the message that the push for women's suffrage existed before Wilson and would outlast him if need be.
_	He based his campaign on the message that he was just one of the people, not an intellectual, but an ordinary hardworking patriot.
_	However, the modern movement sought newness, originality, technical innovation, and ultimately the message that it conveyed spoke of the present and the future, rather than of what had gone before it.
_	After all, it’s the message that matters...
_	He went on to make a full recovery and in 2006 competed in a rugby game alongside Jonah Lomu to promote the message that is possible to make a full recovery following a serious illness and to raise money for charity.
_	This capture sent the message that the Taliban leadership is not safe in Afghanistan or Pakistan.
_	This is more effective than an explicit version of the message that informs receivers the full consequences of digging without calling because receivers are left with a large amount of uncertainty as to the consequences that could result; this plays to the risk averseness of people.
_	Needless to say, Solaris and Selenay are shocked when they read the message that Duke Tremane wishes to join the Alliance.
_	He explained that the equinox is a symbol of the messengers of God and the message that they proclaim is like a spiritual springtime, and that Naw-Rúz is used to commemorate it.
_	The song's aim, with accompanying video, is to raise funds for charities Stonewall and Diversity Role Models for their work addressing the issue of LGBT bullying in schools, and also to help spread the message that it gets better.
_	The Servicemembers Legal Defense Network, a legal support and advocacy group for current and former LGBT military personnel, contacted Secretary Mabus with its concerns over this outcome, stating that it sends the message that as long as LGBT people are subject to separation under "don't ask, don't tell" they can be abused by those above them in the chain of command with little regard for consequences.
_	“But what I’m really concerned about here is the message that that this has sent to millions of pre-teens, daughters, mothers, sisters – women around the country and the world."
_	Speede wants to challenge people's attitudes and uses music to spread the message that if people don't stop eating chimpanzees and gorillas, they will be extinct in 15 years.
_	UK based illustrator Emma Melton has used the giantess as a symbol in her illustrated fashion line 'Blessed by a Giantess', which aims to promote healthy body image in young girls and spread the message that 'We are all beautiful.
_	During May 1915, Foreign Minister of Denmark Erik Scavenius contacted the American government with the message that he believed that the islands ought to be sold to the United States and that although he would not make an official proposal, "if the United States gave any encouragement to the consideration of the possibility of such a sale, it might be possible."
_	A broken window transmits to criminals the message that a community displays a lack of informal social control and so is unable or unwilling to defend itself against a criminal invasion.
_	Manisha Panchakam conveys the message that once a person has attained Self-knowledge, considerations such as his caste are totally irrelevant.
_	There were supposed to be no political speeches at the event except for the message that Nelson Mandela should be freed – coming from Harry Belafonte in his opening speech, from the film stars and musicians introducing the acts or the next piece of music and from the slogans around the stage.
_	It was now that the author of Deuteronomy, working in Josiah's court, reworked older legends, texts, and histories into a single national history; with the message that it had been the non-Deuteronomic practices of the Israelites that had led to their downfalls, and implied that Joshua, as well as David in some respects, was a foreshadowing of what Josiah could achieve.
_	The cell phones the teams received by Craig at the previous elimination ceremony rang with the message that they must choose different captains.
_	The films carry the message that no one is immune from exposures to hazardous chemicals.
_	Bell explained the sense of this as "Have the kindness in courteous wise to give her the message that I shall die unless she will be mine."
_	Propagandists were instructed to convey the message that the person viewing the propaganda media stood to personally lose if he or she failed to contribute; for example, the appeal for women to contribute to the war effort more closely personalized the soldiers dependent on their work as their sons, brothers and husbands.
_	When Raymonde shows Jean the revolver, she also tells him that Sernine had said to pass on the message that he should see Isaac, which Jean does.
_	Think about the message that sends."
_	Richard Warman responded to news of the appeal court's ruling by saying it "sends the message that those who try to use the cloak of free speech to poison other people's reputations through lies and defamation do so at their own peril".
_	Fani-Kayode defined his concept of corpsology (or "corpsocracy" as he sometimes calls it) as "the rulership of the living by the dead" and the thrust and intent of his satire was to clearly convey the message that the attempt to introduce this hitherto unknown system of government into Nigeria by Yaradua, his wife and his kitchen cabinet was unacceptable and must not be allowed to stand.
_	It carries the message that the lyrics of the song are trying to present, and depicts the differences between a rich family and a poor family.
_	The director wanted to convey the message that in spite of tremendous scientific advancements, attitudes towards women have not changed much in the span of a century.
_	The film ends on a happy note as the four walk away smiling, conveying the message that "Whatever happens, life has to go on."
_	After Hawkeye tries to explain that he would have substituted for Winchester if something happened to him, Radar says that Hawkeye is admired and depended upon by most of the staff and to have entered the room as intoxicated as he was, he is sending the message that there is nothing to depend on.
_	Westerwelle recognized that the focus of the Olympics must be the sports competition, but also appealed to Rogge for "a moment's pause at an appropriate time" during the Olympics, which would be "a humanitarian gesture and a fitting way to send the message that violence and terror are incompatible with the Olympic idea."
_	They get through, then rendezvous with Vladimir at a village with the message that the long hoped for first Russian counterattack will begin the next day ("The snow will fall tomorrow").
_	Di instructed the general to return the message that the Yan forces were approaching soon, to convince Geng Bingwen to gather his forces together to prepare for the general attack.
_	As he waits for Fisher to pick him up for the next party, Jimmy mentions to his father that Fisher seemed to be sending him the message that she wanted to become more intimate.
_	Douglas sent them the message that they would stay where they were as long as they liked.
_	It's too tied up in conveying the message that terrible behaviour can have horrible consequences to deal in any subtleties or shades of feeling.
_	He hammers home the message that, far from being merely an industrious underling dispassionately implementing orders, Eichmann was a convinced anti-Semitic ideologue in a key position where he himself could initiate action and make things happen."
_	A communication process is defined as information that is shared with the intent that the receiver understands the message that the business intended to send.
_	According to Mark Andersen and Mark Jenkins' "Dance of Days: Two Decades of Punk in the Nation's Capital", this argument was over exactly what would be said in the message that Nelson wanted MacKaye to record stating essentially what he said without knowing it was being recorded.
_	During his presentation, DNA-tubes were handed out to the audience with the message that each tube contained the private key of exactly one bitcoin, all coded in DNA.
_	This story convinced Yancey that Christians are doing a poor job of communicating the message that God is willing to accept people, regardless of what they have done; the story haunted him, he said, because the woman was "the type of person who would have gone to Jesus.
_	On the IOC's decision to exclude Stepanova, WADA director general Olivier Niggli stated that his agency was "very concerned by the message that this sends whistleblowers for the future."
_	Peter Rainer of the "Los Angeles Times" compares the film to "a fairly clunky sitcom" with its sense of righteous do-goodism, and although the film intends to inspire, it instead sends the message that it would take a superhero to clean up inner-city gang violence.
_	To do this, she incorporated many elements into the show that subverted stereotypes of girls, such as diverse personalities, the message that friends can be different and can get into arguments but still be friends, and the idea that girls should not be limited by what others say they can or can not do.
_	When he got the message that Gahn intended to march his troops back across the border, he decided to strike against the Swedish in the early morning of August the 5th.
_	He told Howard to pass along to Griffith the message that if "today's centurion is picked, the tour will be off".
_	The image portrayed in the campaigns was that of a normal, everyday girl, with the message that it could happen to anyone.
_	The Governor General and Princess Alice became supporters of the Canadian war effort; Alice was appointed Honorary Commandant of a number of women's military services, such as the Women's Royal Canadian Naval Service and the Royal Canadian Air Force Women's Division, while Athlone travelled extensively throughout the country in an effor to spread the message that King George VI was dedicated to fighting totalitarianism.
_	In 2003, the station temporarily closed its gates with the message that the workers were not paid in months, and they had neither any adequate sanitary facilities.
_	However, on arrival, Jourdan ridiculed the project, ordering Coutelle back to Paris, with the message that an Austrian attack was imminent, and a battalion was required, not a balloon.
_	Many young African-Americans are told by their parents to concentrate on school and do well academically, which is similar to the message that many middle-class white students receive.
_	Holmes and Dr. Watson then go to the telegraph office where Holmes uses a ruse to get the woman there to show him the counterfoil of the message that Staunton sent.
_	Vuolasto said that some audience members returned frequently to see it and others wept openly because they understood the message that Kymabi was trying to get across.
_	By 5 pm he was able to send a galloper to Roberts with the message that he was across the Modder.
_	The movement was supported by the linguist and political critic Noam Chomsky, who defined himself as a "chapuller", recording the message that "everywhere is Taksim, everywhere is resistance".
_	The story begins with an eagle flying into a palace and leaving a message written on an "Olai" which is then discovered by Bhadra Manobala who reads and correctly interprets the message that states the return of his guru known as Rana Maayan who is coming tonight to the palace after about 2000 years of being in meditation.
_	But I want to leave you with the message that the Government, and most importantly the people of Afghanistan, believe in this vision and will spare no effort to achieve it."
_	Shaka believes it to be a testament to the quality of the message that he expounds in his choice of music and his Rastafarian beliefs.
_	The president has emphasised in the message that cooperation of divine religions will help resolving problems of mankind", it said.
_	To do this, she incorporated into the design of the characters and the show many elements that contradicted idealized stereotypes of girls, such as diverse personalities, the message that friends can be different and can get into arguments but still be friends, and the idea that girls should not be limited by what others say they can or cannot do.
_	The title of this poem and its rhyme scheme is very appropriate for the message that Blake is trying to convey.
_	Symbolically, the seated Nandi towards sanctum in Siva temples, represents an individual jiva (soul) and the message that the jiva should always be focused on the Parameshwara.
_	The porn industry has poised men and women to receive the message that sexual violence is enjoyable.
_	In September 2010, fundraiser Nayak was mentioned in the press as having been an alleged go between for Jackson and Blagojevich with the message that Jackson would help Blagojevich raise $6 million in exchange for the Senate appointment.
_	It has reinforced the message that the threat to US from Islamic religious policy, and the resulting fear infrastructure and problems in the two countries are intertwined.
_	During the main course messages were brought that an operation had been performed successfully and that Huskisson was recovering; by dessert another messenger brought the message that no operation had been performed after all, and that Huskisson was worsening.
_	It stated that, in addition to the quality of the bid, the decision would send out the message that ConIFA would stand by all of its members.
_	Michielin explained the lyrical content of "Nessun grado di separazione" in several interviews, claiming that the song is inspired by the six degrees of separation theory and contains the message that, "despite all of the cultural differences, there shouldn't be distances between people".
_	James Morrison stated "[X Factor] "sends out the message that you can be famous for doing fuck all and that you can succeed even if you're not a good singer".
_	In 1969, Prince Philip, Duke of Edinburgh, tolerated the white hatting faux pas of new mayor Rod Sykes when Sykes, who had not received the message that the Duke already possessed two Calgary White Hats from previous visits, welcomed the arriving royal with a white hat.
_	For example, the narrative on the origin of the Santror Makkal as the children of Narayana endowed the people with a divine pedigree, and it was a powerful story to drive home the message that the people were a dignified humanity.
_	In "PETA", the parody website's content was not conveyed simultaneously with the message that the site was peta.org.
_	What is the message that Comet Jo must deliver?
_	A third commercial, "1 out of 3", uses "fantasized scenes such as an exploding soda can" to convey the message that tobacco is the only product that prematurely kills one out of three users.
_	Had the District Attorney decided not to prosecute, he’d be sending the message that the disrupters’ conduct was acceptable, effectively making a mockery of the First Amendment and a mockery of our laws.
_	According to the Women's Human Rights Resource Programme of the University of Toronto Bora Laskin Law Library "Throughout the duration of Taliban rule in Afghanistan, the term "Gender Apartheid" was used by a number of women's rights advocates to convey the message that the rights violations experience by Afghan women were in substance no different than those experienced by blacks in Apartheid South Africa."
_	"The best part of this book is the message that it leaves you with:
_	The ruling sparked widespread outrage among anti-racist and immigrant-rights supporters and activists; in the words of far-left Syriza Party MP Vassiliki Katrivanou, "[the ruling] sends the message that a foreign worker can die like a dog in the orchard".
_	By 1995, these results had been replicated by researchers worldwide in at least 24 studies in credible, peer-reviewed research journals using "a variety of methods to see what happens when the facilitator doesn't know or can't guess the message that is expected or doesn't look at the letter display."
_	Traditional Islamic theory preaches the message that all Muslims, regardless of their ethnicity or race, should live together in the "Ummah", where usually been interpreted to mean one state, and for centuries Muslims living under Ottoman rule, whether they be Turks, Kurds, Arabs, Albanians, and so forth all saw themselves as united by a common religion and state.
_	In Chinese philosophy, food is frequently used as the message that the author is trying to convey.
_	Tags also specify the message that shows up in place of the applet if the browser cannot run it due to any reason.
_	"The film comes with the message that humanity is bigger than any religion or any country and that's what we have tried to convey..."
_	After a visit to Pompeii, Italy he found mosaics that survived an ancient volcano and in 2013 he decided to begin filling potholes in Chicago with mosaics, such as a popsicle, flowers, and the message that it's "not a pothole anymore."
_	The scouts returned with confirmation, and the message that if all Kiev's treasures were sold, it wouldn't be enough to buy sufficient paper to inventory Stepanovich's homeland's wealth.
_	By omitting factual information (in this case, numbers) this novel may also reach a wider audience, making it more relatable without specifics and conveying the message that this type of war can occur anywhere so long as the details and individuals are neglected.
_	Its image of the big man and the little man encompasses many of the finer things about Rugby League – the mateship after battle, the satisfaction of the shared experience on the playing field – no matter how hard and tough the struggle has been, the message that Rugby League, for all its professionalism, is still a game.
_	It ends with the message that the empty locker of honesty should not be spoiled with offerings of bribery.
_	The eight-digit sequence "12334746" is the message that is actually transmitted.
_	In 2007, Bryan Fischer, former Director of Issues Analysis for the AFA, hosted Scott Lively at an event promoting the message that "homosexuality was at the heart of Nazism".
_	Just the same, the law communicates the message that faith tradition does not (and should not) consider the possibility that women might have different yet valid perspectives."
_	Asked about the message of the work, he replied, "I don't have an overt 'message', aside from the message that we all should bring beauty into the world, in our deeds and in our relationships.
_	The committee also urged Liberia "to address all forms of violence against women", to make use of every possible means "to convey the message that all forms of violence against women, including domestic violence, are unacceptable", and to ensure that such violence is properly addressed by the judicial system.
_	He wants to reunite with Ryan, but Ryan tells Sandy to pass on the message that he does not want to see him.
_	"We Can Go" was an acknowledgement that they knew they had disappointed some fans by "selling out" or "going metal" – but it contained the message that no matter what the genre, they could still enjoy a punk or metal show as it was the music – not the dress code or hair length – which counted.
_	Talent put forward the message that the US government had to increase its military spending, especially in regard to building a strong missile defense system.
_	The CAC was given the message that women were expected to accept product designs, not contribute to them.
_	The committee, headed by former investigative journalist George Creel, emphasized the message that America's involvement in the war was entirely necessary in achieving the salvation of Europe from the German and enemy forces.
_	Josie and her fellow pussycats are positioned to communicate the message that "Riverdale" is more modern and inclusive than teen dramas of the past, even though it has yet to prove it beyond its casting."
_	Jack and Tracy meet with an NBC shrink, and Jack role-plays Tracy's father, Tracy, and Tracy's mom, among several other people from Tracy's childhood, conveying the message that even though Tracy's parents may have divorced, they still loved him.
_	Despite initial apprehension about campaigning in these communities, Wallace biographer Stephen Lesher credits him with recognizing that they were "powerfully attracted to the message that the civil rights bill might adversely affect their jobs, their property values, the makeup of their neighborhoods, and children's schools".
_	On the IOC's decision to exclude Stepanova, WADA director general Olivier Niggli stated that his agency was "very concerned by the message that this sends whistleblowers for the future."
_	The story also stood out for the message that it was possible for a married woman to carve out a new life, instead of moping and languishing in a corner; instead, it was the man who wasted his life in this story.
_	Couples began dancing as individuals for the first time, sending the message that there did not have to be a leader and a follower.
_	One day, the prisoners got the message that the Scandinavians were going to be released and sent in the white buses back to their home countries, but to Paltiel's misfortune, Quisling had removed the Norwegian Jews' citizenship so they were not included on the evacuation lists.
_	An adversary's advantage is determined by its probability of guessing the value of "b," a value chosen at random at the beginning of the game which determines the message that is encrypted in the LR oracle.
_	premise is rooted in the message that anybody's computer system is fair game so long as the end justifies the means.
_	In addition, although the song's lyrics as well as Farmer conveyed the message that an artist should not considered himself seriously in his profession, critics deemed that Farmer's behavior did not comply with this message.
_	Angus said the options were not to deliver the message that fans would need to purchase all covers.
_	As a long-time Republican politician Reagan had been strongly critical of the People's Republic, but as president Reagan wanted to focus on the struggle against the Soviet Union, which he had dubbed the "evil empire", and wanted China as a "de facto" US ally against the Soviet Union, which was the message that Chennault had conveyed to Deng.
_	The film was produced under a youth advocacy NGO Twaweza with the aim of spreading the message that youths should take action in issues that affect them.
_	Most harmful of all is the message that Microsoft's actions have conveyed to every enterprise with the potential to innovate in the computer industry.
_	He later recalled his intentions were that "it might liven up the place to have a game that people could play, and which could convey the message that our scientific endeavors have relevance for society."
_	Air support had been requested against German positions at Calvi Vecchia on 18 October 1943, but the message that the 169th (London) Infantry Brigade had captured the village, delivered by G.I. Joe, arrived just in time to avoid the bombing.
_	However the message that García Márquez intends to deliver explains a true history.
_	The contest began for Democrats with a brutal primary challenge; U.S. Congressman Klink narrowly bested State Senator Allyson Schwartz and former Lieutenant Governor nominee Tom Foley by running on the message that he was the only candidate capable of defeating the Republican.
_	The audience is left with the message that "good must triumph always."
_	In the runoff election, Range's opponent, a white man named Irwin Christie, sent a sound truck through white neighborhoods the day before the election broadcasting the message that if the white people did not get out and vote, they would have a black woman making laws for them.
_	Members of President Eisenhower's cabinet passed along the message that Flanders should "lay off."
_	For example, the Family Research Council opposes mandatory vaccination against HPV, a virus that causes various cancers, writing, "Our primary concern is with the message that would be delivered to nine- to 12-year-olds with the administration of the vaccines.
_	With the message that forgiveness and redemption are possible regardless of sins committed and that the soul can be delivered from despair through the mercy of God, "Amazing Grace" is one of the most recognisable songs in the English-speaking world.
_	Lead singer Tyler Connolly said he wanted to be sure the lyrics did not convey the message that it is "cool to be high" or that the band were taking advantage or "poking fun" at issues surrounding substance abuse.
_	I only want to spread the message that Muslims should be allowed to leave Islam behind without being threatened"
_	Ultimately, however, she finds that "Siti Akbari" conveys the message that women should be faithful and obedient to their husbands.
_	There are a few skeptics that denounce Anita's Near Death Experience and criticize the message that she speaks.
_	Ankle Deep in Reality - Restoring Eden Speaking Tours: Restoring Eden teamed up with Sara Kaweesa, a leader of A Rocha Uganda, and Rev. Tafue Lusama, a minister from the South Pacific island of Tuvalu to bring the message that climate change is a reality today.
_	The group also focuses on the message that it is possible to be both LGBT and Jewish.
_	By the end of the song "Damien" there is a section where Jon's reversed voice repeats the message that is also in the middle, silent section of the song.
_	Copeland said: "I was trying in my naive way to write a protest song with the message that death is the great leveller...
_	In "The Best Ye Breed", this notion of white supremacy is rejected at the socioeconomic level when Crawford and his men reveal to Paul Kosloff that they wish to undermine the West's "mad system" of a "waste economy," which necessitates the voracious exploitation of Africa's raw materials and thereby denies Africa the ability to develop; at the historical level, when Isobel Cunningham instructs Sergeant Charles on the fact that North Africa is the origin of civilization; at the cultural level when Doctor Megan McDaid distances herself from Major Ryan's white mercenaries, one of whom is her fiance, and explains herself by reciting the first two lines of Kipling's poem to indicate that Ryan and his men are the "worst" the white race can offer; and at the anthropological level when Crawford deploys exactly twenty-three nonwhites to battle the twenty-three white mercenaries to reverse the message that "a handful of whites [are] worth hundreds of blacks."
_	Brown sent the message that a woman should have men complement her life, not take it over.
_	According to the Washington Post, in December 2009, after US President Barack Obama announced he would deploy 30,000 more U.S. soldiers, and that Washington wants others to follow suit, Turkish Prime Minister Recep Tayyip Erdoğan reacted with the message that Turkey would not contribute additional troops to Afghanistan.
_	In the story's final part, Willow and Rack battle until he is defeated, and she in turn is guided by a sentient universe back to Earth—this time, with her own magic restored and the message that it is for all the world to share.
_	The aim of the meeting was to convey the message that the Rwandan Government supports M23 politically and militarily.
_	She also notes that the film conveys the message that one must be ready to sacrifice things for love.
_	The film also took its themes from Buddhist philosophy, that there is no happiness that is greater than peace, but also carried the message that Pridi thought Thailand was ready to fight a war of aggression by any foreign invaders.
_	Ironically, this thoroughly non-sociological book makes use of a sociological truth--that people are constantly reinterpreting their past to make their view of that past more functional for their present--as he delivers the message that people's problems are not really their fault.
_	On the morning of Monday, December 8, 1941, he received the message that Pearl Harbor had been attacked by the Japanese a few hours earlier (Sunday, December 7, 1941).
_	This preferential treatment was designed to strike at the baptists who had broken off in order to give them the message that there was no point in remaining in opposition.
_	She did not attend the unveiling because she wanted it to happen at the United Nations and was not happy with the message that was sent when the design was unveiled on the Love Boat.
_	The accompaniment is a constant ascending and descending of arpeggios and scales, painting an impression of the wind, upon which the voice is the message that the wind bears, mostly in broad half and quarter notes traveling chromatically in half steps with the occasional leap.
_	But what dominates in his memory is the testimony of his example and his word next to the message that holiness is available to all for the simple way of surrender to the will of God.
_	Angara said that "we decided to use ‘PNoy’ to send the message that this campaign is for all Filipinos."
_	The impression on the blotter yields a part of the message that Staunton sent: "Stand by us for God’s sake".
_	Giving the album four and a half stars by Christian Music Zine, Joshua Andre says, ""Echo Of Love" is sure to melt the hearts of even the most hardened; well done guys on a quality debut, it is worth celebrating, and the message that we are the echo of love is something we all need to hear!"
_	It appears that the painting has no moral aspect, as the message that Delacroix wanted to convey in this work remains unknown.
_	The underlying issue with brands featuring underweight models, therefore revolves around expressing "the message that an unhealthy body type is the most socially valued".
_	He argued that if his campaign caused Baird to lose, the Conservatives would "get the message that social conservatives are serious about their politics."
_	The use of memes has been another feature to spread the message that adds satire and humor to the protests.
_	Furthermore, the use of Codemeshing assures the message that is being created will have the ability to reach a broader audience and to a deeper level, that is, the act of bringing different adaptations of the language to the conversation functions as an inclusive tool for the audience to engage with the text and the author.
_	Together they wanted to send out the message that TV drama must reflect everyone regardless of race, gender, class, sexual orientation or disability.
_	They were offered the last chance: if they want to return, they have to read out the message that they plead guilty; otherwise, they will not have been admitted.
_	The Jem'Hadar send a Jem'Hadar representative to Deep Space Nine with the message that no further intrusions into Dominion space will be tolerated and to hand Major Kira Nerys a list of colonies and ships already eliminated for trespassing.
_	In this capacity, Muslim has stressed the message that "the Kurdish problem in Turkey and the Kurdish problem in Syria are two separate issues and will be resolved separately.
_	The magazine promotes the message that one does not need to be rich or old to be a philanthropist and that they just have to care about others.
_	CPD conveys through its lobbying and media activities the message that the war on terror must be won.
_	Following the message that a Rat Creature army is crossing the Eastern border, Fone Bone, Thorn, and Gran'ma Ben travel off-road to Barrelhaven.
_	He found that Turkish history textbooks are filled with the message that Armenians are people "who are incited by foreigners, who aim to break apart the state and the country, and who murdered Turks and Muslims."
_	The poem puts forward the message that nature is the ultimate good influence.
_	She uses fan letters, interviews, magazine critiques, segments from her shows (although mostly from Xou da Xuxa), and photos from magazine spreads to analyze the message that Xuxa pushes out.
_	The conferences focus on what it terms "the family dynamics that can lead to the development of same-sex desires", stressing that homosexuality is abnormal, claiming, "The goal of gay activists is to 'overhaul' America with the message that homosexuality is normal and healthy."
_	This incident drove home the message that president Cleveland wanted Queen Liliuokalani's return to power, so on July 4, 1894 the Republic of Hawaii was proclaimed to wait for President Cleveland's second term to finish.
_	The symbolism carried the message that she was charged with the guidance of the young, soon-to-be king.
_	Nimitz was unsure whether to report this inconclusive contact, but decided to do so to prevent Fremantle from being the target of a surprise attack; he later wrote that "'Remember Pearl Harbor' was the message that kept sticking in my mind".
_	Issue #5 (October 2006)'s solicitation announced that there will be eight issues again, although the actual issue included the message that "this" was the last regular issue and the story would be completed in "The Winter Special", announced for 2007 but actually released two years after #5, on December 31, 2008 as an oversized 40 page special.
_	School Library Journal's Lori Henderson reviewed "An Ideal World" positively; she praised the "Wizard of Oz feel" ending and the message that A You "controls his life, and he has the power to change it".
_	Ai had been widely thought to be untouchable, but Nicholas Bequelin from Human Rights Watch suggested that his arrest, calculated to send the message that no one would be immune, must have had the approval of someone in the top leadership.
_	It took two hours to pass the message that the hill had been secured and as it was already dark, further delays were encountered by the Indian Division struggling to find Castle Hill.
_	As the speed of planes increased this resulted in a plane reaching its destination before the message that it was on its way arrived at the airfield.
_	A clinical psychologist, Barbara Greenberg, told "Teen Vogue" that casting twenty-year-old actors for the roles of high-school students can worsen the struggles of adolescents, stating "It can give the message that they’re supposed to look good all the time" adding "That leads to all kinds of body-image and social-comparison issues".
_	Notwithstanding this, the Israeli authorities began to broadcast the message that the boys were abducted, not that they had been murdered.
_	Steven MacDougall quits the army when he receives the message that his father has been gunned down by a member of the Lopez clan.
_	Speech-related gestures are used in parallel with verbal speech; this form of nonverbal communication is used to emphasize the message that is being communicated.
_	In 1503, for example, a letter is preserved with the message that he had received her report, that a meeting between the Hanseatic League and the Danish monarch was to take place, information she had extracted from a ship from Lübeck, and he gave her the task to find out when and where this meeting was to take place.
_	The enumeration using the last syllable/word as the beginning of the next reference enhances the message that everything is linked, a common theme throughout Dream Theater's albums.
_	Zhuang Cunyu (another prominent native of Changzhou), however, had an intellectual influence other than textological: he was an embodiment of the message that scholarly activity for a Confucian cannot be divorced from the political.
_	Once inside the White Tower, the duo is met by Queen Elizabeth II (played by Joanna Lumley) who pardons them with the message that young people should be more caring of the elderly.
_	Concerned at what they considered to be mutiny, the Admiralty sent three popular officers to "Africaine" with the message that if the protest was quietly dropped there would be no courts-martial for mutiny but if not, the entire crew would be liable to attack.
_	It also demonstrates dangers in the wild, representing the hazards throughout Europe, furthering the message that Germans should stay in Germany.
_	The lyrics apparently convey the message that heavy metal fans cannot understand what their idols sing.
_	The Turkish government sent an envoy to Damascus, who gave the Syrian government the message that they must remove Maher Assad, which the envoy called Syria's "thug in chief".
_	In November 2014, they released a video to promote the message that "friends don't let friends get married without the prenup."
_	At lunch, Carmelita Spats delivers the message that the Baudelaire orphans are to meet Coach Genghis on the front lawn at sundown, the time of Nero's violin concert.
_	Both kinds of expression are phrasemes, and can be contrasted with ’’free phrases’’, expressions where all of the members (barring grammatical elements whose choice is forced by the morphosyntax of the language) are chosen freely, based exclusively on their meaning and the message that the speaker wishes to communicate.
_	Before Varga takes the communicator, the Doctor relays the message that Clent needs to use the Ioniser, regardless of consequences.
_	This also convey the message that Hong Kong is a place where the Chinese and Western cultures meet.
_	The title of the album, "Out of the Ashes," explains the message that she has remained an artist without the help of Jennings.
_	Encryption, especially using a theoretically secure method, when properly executed, such as the one-time pad, is highly secure, but a counterintelligence agent seeing nonsense characters will immediately become suspicious of the message that has been captured.
_	Their main goal was to spread the message that there should be constitutional recognition for the rights of indigenous peoples, including non-Status Indians, and Métis
_	10050 Cielo Drive is referred to as the "Tate House" since Sharon Tate was murdered by members of the Manson Family in 1969; Reznor named the studio "Le Pig" after the message that was scrawled on the front door with Tate's blood by her murderers, and stayed there with Malm for 18 months.
_	As for the message that Hook received to bring Emma back to Storybrooke, Mary Margaret and David tell Emma that they never sent Hook a note or the memory potion he gave Emma, but Hook insists that he's not lying and someone must have sent them to him.
_	Through short videos and other visuals that show consumers sleeping everywhere but their own bed, the campaign reinforces the message that they may need to replace their mattress if they are nodding off during the day because and not getting 7–8 hours of quality rest on a comfortable, supportive mattress.
_	It conveys the message that homosexuality is normal, and a natural progression of society".
_	When Leibniz got the message that Boyneburg had died he wrote in a letter to John Frederick, Duke of Brunswick-Lüneburg:
_	He effectively conveys the message that women cannot be relied upon to take on a greater role in society, which becomes the moral of the tale.
_	Through comedy writer Walter Williams and San Francisco advertising agency Goodby Silverstein & Partners, Pizza Hut created "The Pizza Head Show" series of television commercials to convey the message that Pizza
_	Throughout the spring and early summer of 1938, Bonnet refused to apply pressure through official channels and instead used unofficial emissaries to carry the message that France might not go to war in the event of a German invasion, leading Prague to place more assurance on French statements of public support that was warranted.
_	According to Ron Paul, the purpose of the Campaign for Liberty is to continue the principles that invoked the grassroots support of his campaign, and to also be able to continue the message that he promoted during the course of his bid, without having a presidential campaign, and is also intended to "lay the groundwork for a different America."
_	The tagline also aimed to convey the message that communicating well goes beyond grammar and vocabulary and involves being able to express and be understood as well.
_	There was no mistaking the message that the reforming spirit of Francis's fresh broom had poked sharply into another corner of the Vatican.
_	By the end of the song Madonna is shown driving the car, with a knowing, defiant smile on her lips and has ditched the man, thereby giving the message that she was in charge, a theme recurrent throughout her career.
_	Other themes included protecting children at all costs, and the message that people can overcome hardships and abuse suffered as children.
_	Through the shackling of hands, it conveys the message that denying Deaf people access to signed languages is harmful, represented by the broken fingers.
_	Joe Scarborough attempted to enforce the message that you can not trust healthcare providers by asking, “you’ve got to be very skeptical of every doctor and every nurse?
_	There is a commonly held societal stereotype that those involved in open relationships are less committed or mature than those who are in monogamous relationships; and films, media, and self-help books present the message that to desire more than one partner means not having a "true" relationship.
_	The reported size of the message that is encoded in the first two bytes of the printers response is higher, accordingly.
_	Through the use of the term "movement", LSI attempts to give the message that it is open and inclusive.
_	She promotes the message that people with disabilities are sexy, datable, educated and glamorous – and that they are integrating more successfully than ever into the urban social and professional scene.
_	The video conveys the message that, while education is good, educational institutions leave much to be desired.
_	When his flight is approaching Pearl Harbor, they receive the message that an attack is under way.
_	A longtime supporter of the full inclusion of gays and lesbians in the church, he had avoided broaching the subject of his own sexuality because as a monk "he did not want to send the message that, as some conservatives argue, gay people should be celibate."
_	League seal exhibits the phrases "The Eight Hour Day," "A Living Wage," and "To Guard the Home," thereby conveying the message that the WTUL believed that in advocating for reduced work hours, and raising wages, women workers would be able to better attend domestic responsibilities at home.
_	In 2014, Myers starred in a commercial with his brother Peter for Sears Canada, using "humorous banter to spread the message that, despite rumours, Sears wasn't shutting down".
_	When Olivia shows up at the hospital, Sally doesn't tell her about the letter; in turn, Olivia doesn't tell Sally about the message that Vincent left for her--this leaves both women believing that he loved them more than the other.
_	President Ayub Khan also sent telegrams to Nehru and Sheikh Abdullah with the message that as Pakistan too was a party to the Kashmir dispute any resolution of the conflict without its participation would not be acceptable to Pakistan.
_	A man arrives from Corinth with the message that Oedipus's father has died.
_	In the fall of 1943, Millholland led a raid to Normandy at Ile d'Oussant, an island off the coast of France destroying a German radar post and leaving his rifle symbolically stabbed into the ground with his helmet liner on top to send the message that the Americans had been there and would return.
_	Graelent returns empty-handed, and resigns himself to trial, but just then beautiful damsels arrive in court, with the message that the lady will soon be present to acquit Graelent of his veracity.
_	A theme that many retailers employed was to send out the message that sewing not only saved money and let them explore their personal style, but was also a way to be feminine and show gracefulness.
_	"If I can inspire others, I hope that I can offer the message that the path is more important than the destination -- that the journey should be the focus.
_	As she had done at Sci-Fi, Hammer rebranded USA with “Characters Welcome,” – conveying the message that people, and “wacky but memorable characters” were at the heart of the channel’s programming.
_	A decision was made after that commercial that it would make a bad impression on the youth to give the message that if you want to become a champion, you should drink.
_	Signaling in a 4.7 out of five review at Christian Music Review, Kelly Meade recognizes, "Aaron Shust presents an album that showcases a collection of beautifully written, Christ centered songs of praise set to an overall fresh sounding musical backdrop which pulls you in to the message that the words being sung convey."
_	Robert Kennedy telephoned the White House, and at about 10:00 P.M. relayed the message that Mrs. Kennedy wanted the same bier.
_	The police did not heed the message that night and sent a commission to Rio Colonial Sugar two police officers and three Indians.
_	The songs contains the message that a good friend is the best that you can find on the earth.
_	In an interview for the Channel 4 programme "1983: The Brink of Apocalypse", about exercise Able Archer 83, broadcast in the UK on 5 January 2008, he said that he had transmitted the message that NATO was "not" preparing to launch a surprise nuclear attack against the USSR during the exercise to his HVA controllers.
_	He was so well known that some of his former students would advertise their work with the message that they had been taught by him.
_	This is explicitly the message that Bó wanted to give with the film, with a text reading at the conclusion:
_	Thus the admonitions would always be accompanied by the message that God would remember his covenant with Abraham, Isaac and Jacob.
_	During May 1915, Foreign Minister of Denmark Erik Scavenius contacted the American government with the message that he believed that the islands ought to be sold to the United States and that although he would not make an official proposal, "if the United States gave any encouragement to the consideration of the possibility of such a sale, it might be possible."
_	Which would embrace the message that if one cannot be genuinely good, then one cannot be a good speaker for the people.
_	The two-year World TB Day campaign "I am stopping TB", launched in 2008, highlighted the message that the campaign belonged to people everywhere doing their part to Stop TB.
_	She also wrote a picture book for children, "The Beauty Who Would Not Spin" (Scholastic, 1988), in which she hoped "that her young readers will take from her theme the message that the world offers many options to women and that their choices should be guided by the natural talents and instincts rather than by the expectations of others".
_	She was acquainted with Gyllenborg since before her marriage, and after the death of her spouse, he made it known to her that he was in love with her through a poem with the message that it was better to confess to a love than to let it die.
_	He also dispatched Rangers Fount Bettie and Harry Heaton to report to Early, who was camped near Antietam Creek, with the message that Mosby's command would coordinate with his.
_	Shortly after, Wright received a second call from Maizlish to reinforce the message that Gerrold must not be allowed to work on the script.
_	Advertising plays a major role in creating a consumerist society, as goods are marketed through various platforms in nearly all aspects of life, pushing the message that the viewer's life is in need of some product.
_	AMQP defines as the "bare message", that part of the message that is created by the sending application.
_	The Doctor and Bill help Godsacre leave the message that NASA will discover.
_	Moreover, the announcement of a small and minimum dress size, which does not fit the average body type of most countries, continues to "send the message that super slim body types is the 'ideal'".
_	The purpose of the project is to share the message that all human beings have a wish - whether conscious or not - to connect with the Divine; that all religions have at their core the same timeless principles that are intended to serve the fullest realization of enlightenment; and that if all of us understood this, it could lead to greater compassion among people and a more peaceful world.
_	I try to be positive, and convey the message that G‑d is really there and always listening.
_	By the middle of the 15th century, special masses called "missa contra Turcos" (Latin for "mass against Turks") were held in various places in Europe to spread the message that victory over the Ottomans was only possible with the help of God and that a Christian community was therefore necessary to withstand the cruelty of the Turks.
_	It sends the message that the Conservatives still believe a childless, dual-income, but married couple is more deserving of a financial pat on the head than those struggling, as I once was, to keep their families afloat in difficult times.
_	"This monument would like to impart the message that the Filipino is a 'man of peace' yet is ready to protect his territory and people if threatened," Gordon added.
_	Estraven's death at the end was seen as giving the message that "death is the price that must be paid for forbidden love".
_	'All in Your Name' is in fact the message that Michael wanted to send out to all of his fans all over the world that he did it all for them and for the pure love of music.
_	It was created by Leonard Knight to convey the message that "God Loves Everyone".
_	The clinic opened in early November, 1961 and almost immediately was this met with controversy, largely due to protesters such as James Morris, who picketed outside of the clinic with the message that what Griswold and Buxton were doing was immoral.
_	Irvine observed that the buildings selected for preservation tended to be estates, castles and manor houses associated with the elite, which sends the message that the story of Britain is the story of its elites.
_	The next morning he sends the woman back to his mother with an expensive pin which Olympias had told Alexander to save for his bride someday, and the message that from now on he will choose his own lovers.
_	Finally, Henlein was told to ask only for autonomy, but to subtlety promote the message that ethnic Germans and Czechs could not co-exist in the same country.
_	This short children's story sends the message that beauty is not always seen on the surface but found within the heart of a person.
_	The Deputy Chief Minister of Guernsey attended the UK Liberal Democrats conference in 2012 to communicate the message that "Guernsey and the Channel Islands are good neighbours to the UK".
_	Prime Minister Winston Churchill sent the message that “St Paul’s must be saved at all costs”.
_	The company received national exposure when their students became involved in protests in front of local liquor stores, carrying the message that drinking and driving was not acceptable.
_	The first time the red phone rang Egbert answered it and heard the message that the viewers would decide whether he would stay.
_	We want to send out the message that he can't portray a negative image of men."
_	On September 27, 2015, Gladu received the message that her name had been legally changed to Gabrielle Diana Gladu.
_	An article in "The Guardian" mused: "The arrest made a very small splash in the western media, which comes as little surprise because a story with a warm North and a cold South is doesn't square easily with the message that has been delivered by media outlets in Europe and the US for the last two decades."
_	The Cylon man brings the message that two Cylon "heroes" (a Number Six and Number Eight who they identify as the resurrected Boomer), have convinced the rest of the Cylons that the attack on the Colonies, along with the pursuit of the fleet, were errors.
_	He gave Munro the message that "he should return home peacefully unless his intention was to throw his lot in with the Jacobites" Munro obliged and returned to his seat at Foulis Castle.
_	This is the message that flows out of Chanakya’s Chant."
_	The scientist, Jeff Goldblum, discovers that he can reverse the polarity of the message that the alien ship is transmitting.
_	Some researchers argue that a strong alternative narrative to violent jihadist groups is to convey the message that they mostly harm Muslims.
_	Carol the message that Hal was truly alive in the Dead Zone, Sinestro struggles for Kyle's white ring and attempts to become a White Lantern himself, but it strangely rejected him; the white ring then comes into the possession of Simon, but when he failed to restore Sinestro's home planet; the white ring returns to Kyle's ownership.
_	Analysts and other activists said Ai had been widely thought to be untouchable, but Nicholas Bequelin from Human Rights Watch suggested that his arrest, calculated to send the message that no-one would be immune, must have had the approval of someone in the top leadership.
_	Bin Saud was convinced by the message that the U.S.–Saudi relations had begun to run smooth again.
_	Ito's campaign rarely addressed the issue of nuclear power, instead stressing his focus on supporting the forestry, agricultural, fishery and tourism industries, with the message that "continuity is power".
_	The #fail hashtag is used on the microblogging site Twitter to indicate contempt or displeasure, and the image that formerly accompanied the message that the site was overloaded is referred to as the "fail whale".
_	The group is popular among girls, and aims to reach both boys and girls with the message that boys don't have to feel ashamed about liking "cute" characters.
_	Gavrilis opened channels of communication with those inside the town, attempting to send the message that they "cared more about the people of Ar Rutbah than did the Fedayeen."
_	Its goal is to prevent suicide among LGBT youth by having gay adults convey the message that these teens' lives will improve.
_	According to Endres and Lueck (p. 299), ""Red Book" was trying to convey the message that it offered something for everyone, and, indeed, it did...
_	These envoys reached Chelmsford on 4 June with the message that Cetshwayo wished to know what terms would be acceptable to cease hostilities.
_	While he makes no specific reference to the possible war with Greece or the previous war (that might be too dangerous), he does seem to push the message that the government should take care of its own people before attempting any other military actions.
_	He related that, "When Deirdre decided to stop seeing Mike and stay with Ken, the scoreboard at Old Trafford on the night flashed the message that the couple were not splitting up to 56,000 football fans, amid thunderous cheers from the crowd!" 20 million viewers tuned in for the episode; it attained the soap's second-highest recorded overnight ratings, surpassed only by the farewell episode of Hilda Ogden (Jean Alexander) in 1987.
_	Produced during Ronald Reagan's first term as president, the Eagle Force toy line was marketed to send the message that the United States wasn't going to be "pushed around" anymore.
_	At times [Caramarcu's] band mates freeze and become 'mannequins' themselves, adding to the message that anyone can become frozen or indeed come back to life."
_	The smaller the probability of event formula_1, the larger the quantity of self-information associated with the message that the event indeed occurred.
_	The music video captures the family warmth and spirit of Teck Ghee and hopes to bring across the message that regardless of our race, language or religion, we stand united as a nation because we are all one big family.
_	As Merlin was finishing the message that would be later be received in Storybrooke, Hook appears and locks the doors, revealing that he planned to cast another Dark Curse in order to get his revenge on Gold.
_	Her book reinforced the message that the fashion industry (Vogue, Chanel, etc.) was implying through the design of their clothing: being fat was no longer in style.
_	I wanted to find a story that was just as exciting and interesting but doesn't send the message that in the end that 'might makes right'."
_	The goal is to prevent suicide among LGBT youth by having LGBT adults convey the message that the teens' lives will improve.
_	Teng Biao, a lawyer who represented Mr. Xia, suggested the sentence was intended to send the message that any challenges to the government would not be tolerated.
_	During the night, a ship had brought him the message that De Ruyter had likewise been victorious, so Tromp was in a euphoric mood.
_	This is the message that the paintings of Chatin Sarachi express."which we think to be very suitable to his work and personality".
_	The play was written during the midst of the AIDS epidemic, which is the central focus of the story, though ultimately the play sends the message that one should pay attention to the world around them and realize its problems rather than shun it.
_	The ads were intended to carry the message that Allstate's service was superior to that from low-cost providers GEICO and Progressive.
_	As far as the U.S. is concerned, the message that has gone with this resolution will definitely ring alarm bells, "vis-à-vis" their policy of bulldozing Pakistan."
_	Enoch was later on summoned to join the army, his task was to be done by himself and to find and deliver the message that George Washington moved from Valley Forge to General Dickinson who was attempting to harass the enemy during his march.
_	He let them live so that they can spread the message that he doesn't endorse Aftershock and the Bastards of Evil's terrorism.
_	Its volunteers often style themselves with eyelash extensions, stiletto heels, skinny jeans, skin-tight T-shirts, and backcombed hair to convey the message that such things are, in their view, not sinful.
_	On the morning of 27 August Cave refused further attempts at compromise from Khalid and, receiving the message that "We have no intention of hauling down our flag and we do not believe you would open fire on us"; Cave replied "We do not want to open fire, but unless you do as you are told we shall certainly do so".
_	They are used to send the message that drug dealers forfeit all their glamorous trappings when they get caught.
_	A film with the message that learning to love yourself is the greatest love of all, although I think the people who made that film loved themselves rather too much."
_	One ad focuses on the message that CO is misrepresented as a pollutant, stating that "it's essential to life.
_	Both carry the message that children can overcome their own problems.
_	In 1921, to “dignify the field of business art in the eyes of artists” and communicate the message that “artistic excellence is vitally necessary to successful advertising,” Calkins organized the first juried exhibition of advertising art.
_	The comic book is Scrapyard Detectives, created by Bill Galvan and Chad Denton, and was originally created as "a way for kids to get the message that being different is great, and diversity should be appreciated and celebrated.".
_	In the second reading (, "aliyah"), Jacob assembled a present of hundreds of goats, sheep, camels, cattle, and donkeys to appease Esau, and instructed his servants to deliver them to Esau in successive droves with the message that they were a present from his servant Jacob, who followed behind.
_	The gag was designed in this way because broadcasting standards wanted to portray the message that God would not have unprotected sex.
_	News commentator Dick Morris remarked that McCain's decision to welcome Johnston to the stage was a good move because it would help McCain show "a nonjudgmental", tolerant attitude, while still sending the message that unwed teens who become pregnant should marry.
_	In a world where children come first, Idu sends the message that the love of two people is greater than the love for a child.
_	During the 2000 U.S. presidential election the organization was led by Andrew Boyd and Jenny Levison as "Billionaires for Bush (or Gore)," with the message that whichever candidate became president, corporations and the wealthy were guaranteed to benefit.
_	Upon release, Goodrem said: "As a songwriter, I look at the message that I want to convey in a song, in this case, and after working on a number of different projects, I genuinely went into the writing session with an open mind that it didn't have to come with as much gravity in the sentiment, it just has to feel good.
_	On this journey he instructs her to find Hafela and give him the message that Hokosa will help him regain his throne if he is made second in command.
_	To solve the kidnap mystery cops Shiva (Lakshmi Manchu) and Richard (Sunil) arrive at the resort feigning to convey the message that Munna Bhai has been arrested.
_	The co-authors wrote that Larabee implies that "legitimate forms of intelligence can only be achieved through a Eurocentric perspective, thus advancing the message that Akeelah must be rescued from her African-American ways of knowing, in order to be considered intellectual."
_	While the children all appeared to understand the message that guns are not toys, when the children were left alone with prop guns (and a hidden camera capturing their reactions), they all proceeded to use them as if they were toys.
_	It conveyed the message that the decision to smoke should be left to each individual: in America the government does not have the authority to dictate each person's lifestyle choices.
_	During the meeting, Fukuda was passed the message that President Xi wanted to meet with the Japanese Prime Minister Abe.
_	In 2013, Miyazaki stated that "Howl's Moving Castle" was his favorite creation, and explained his choice by saying "I wanted to convey the message that life is worth living, and I don't think that's changed."
_	(This is the message that most of the press reported, although others reported that the "75% without errors" figure was out of the completed, not the total, recount; still, the figures were hard to square with Coalition claims.)
_	Additionally, they gave one group an article pertaining to the message that "bronze is beautiful," one relating to the idea that "pale is pretty," and one neutral article that did not speak of tan or pale skin tones.
_	The part of the image that looks like a letter "M" is there to demonstrate to the reader of the message that the curved line is a paraboloid mirror.
_	The newly created states in August 1991 were run by administrators rather than governors, a term used to reinforce the message that their tenure was interim until elected governors could take over.
_	This logo is symbolic to the organization, because it displays the message that LRDA will continue to help others in both the present and the future of these designated communities.
_	On November 5, the "Sun-Sentinel" reported that the message that ultimately led to Incognito's suspension was made after Martin missed two days of the team's voluntary workout program.
_	He wrote in the message that he informed Slovakia in time and no objections have been raised earlier about the date.
_	Dean's mind is "not a tape recorder, but it certainly received the message that was being given."
_	The Court sent the message that grand jury indictments, as required per the Fifth Amendment, would be held to a strict standard.
_	The lyric conveys the message that purifying your own soul can open the way, by which one can change the mind of others.
_	St. Marciana’s story sends the message that faith and belief in Jesus Christ is stronger than any worldly threat or force that one can encounter and this is a hope in which even the weakest (especially the weakest) and most vulnerable can take refuge.
_	For the encore, Stan defies the park's management and the pair sing Hayley's anti-gun song instead, sending out the message that guns are bad.
_	The protests intended to convey the message that the man's murder was God's response to Canadian laws permitting abortion, homosexuality, divorce and remarriage.
_	On April 8, 2014, the EPB issued another statement to commemorate the birthday of Betances, this time quoting the message that Ojeda Ríos offered nine years before and citing that to them it was still as relevant.
_	Knobelsdorff immediately set out, but halfway to Berlin a "Feldjäger" (military policeman) caught up with him with the message that he was to return to the court.
_	“The campaign wants to drive home the message that the marital status of a woman should not decide which color she can or cannot wear, emphasizes Lily.
_	After the two spoke in January 2017, he "delivered the message that I had to deliver" while recording the track, describing it as "one of unification and love".
_	In an interview posted on "The Liberian Journal" website, Dearboy (commenting on "Evil Genius") said, "I just want to send out the message that in spite of the many evil geniuses around, we still can find others who are geniuses of goodness".
_	However, she also is out, so Enrico slips Pappacoda a coin to give Barbara a letter with the message that Enrico will be ready for her at nine o'clock that evening.
_	But he didn't get the message that the party was cancelled.
_	This gives the message that it is necessary to have the Ratnatraya in order to attain moksha.
_	Rather than damage done intentionally to the piece such as Egyptian Sphinx, these sculptures convey the message that figures can be created the way they would like to be regardless of gender or background.
_	Selous subsequently argued that he had simply been trying to convey the message that disabled people were valued by employers, and his observation that disabled people often work harder was supported by a spokesperson for Disability Rights UK.
_	Fairey's design titled "Create Your Future" was one of three installments in the #ArtsMatter campaign, which was a collaborative effort with P.S. ARTS and featured the art displayed on billboards and buses across the city of Los Angeles to send the message that arts matter in schools.
_	The decision was first protested against by the Outer Mongol Khalkha nobles and then the Khalkhas sought to have him placed at a distance from them at Dolonnor, but Qianlong snubbed both of their requests, sending the message that he was putting an end to Outer Mongolian autonomy.
_	"He gave millions of children the message that the old and the young have a lot to say to each other," said Joan Ganz Cooney, president of the Children's Television Workshop.
_	Julio Chevalier created in 1861 a stained-glass window where Mary and Jesus of feet appear, the boy touches his heart with the left hand and with his right he points to his mother in high, sending the message that through Mary the faithful can reach the heart of Jesus.
_	All of these aspects can distort the message that the sender is disseminating towards the public.
_	This hall also contains a number of swings that visitors could try, and aimed to deliver the message that true innovation comes from play.
_	Yippie activities were used to put across the message that the average American didn't have control over the political process.
_	Brinkman said the ordinance "send[s] the message that you openly approve of homosexuality," citing the Catechism of the Catholic Church
_	Despite Willow's attempts to cheer up Dawn, she cries a little and is about to open up to Willow, when Renee brings the message that Buffy needs Willow's advice on computer security.
_	"Columbus on Trial" contains a variety of characters, all an important part of the message that the film conveys to its audience.
_	Haig ordered his Army Commanders to pass down to all ranks the message that bold attacks were now needed, even to the point of divisions driving for distant objectives leaving their flanks uncovered: “risks which a month ago would have been criminal to incur, ought now to be incurred as a duty”.
_	According to Israeli newspaper "Haaretz", the state TV announcement appeared aimed at sending the message that Assad is alive, well and still firmly in charge.
_	Stephen and Lou apologise to Wayne and Russell gets the message that he is not welcome in Ramsay Street.
_	Neil McCormick of "The Telegraph" called the song an "epic closing track", commenting that "Bowie sounds like he is grappling with his own mystery: 'Seeing more and feeling less / Saying no but meaning yes / This is all I ever meant / That's the message that I sent.'"
_	For example, on 12 February 2006, the 197th anniversary of Charles Darwin's birth was commemorated by "Evolution Sunday" where the message that followers of Christ do not have to choose between biblical stories of creation and evolution was taught in classes and sermons at many Methodist, Lutheran, Episcopalian, Presbyterian, Unitarian, Congregationalist, United Church of Christ, Baptist and community churches.
_	The same year, a series of sex education workshops were run throughout the country carrying the message that homophobia was a prejudice.
_	These include: the character of Rudolf himself, founder of the Habsburg dynasty still ruling in the 19th century; the message that, under a just ruler, the disparate states of Austria-Hungary could successfully be part of a united empire (at a time when this empire was starting to creak at the joints); and not least in the monologue of Otto von Hornek in Act III, since known as the 'Praise of Austria' ('die Lobrede auf Österreich'), which has been taught in isolation to many generations of Austrian schoolchildren since.
_	Lyrically, the song speaks to the emotional baggage people carry and sends the message that a "second hand heart" is still capable of great love.
_	So is the message that now goes forth to the nations of the world that the Jewish people claim the right to impose a holocaust on others in order to preserve the State.
_	The village was scheduled to be bombarded by the Allied forces on 18 October 1943, but the message that the British had captured the village, delivered by G.I. Joe, arrived just in time to avoid the bombing.
_	Paco to pass on the message that his mother is dead, and not to go to San Martín.
_	On 2 June, Healy tweeted again, but revealed a cryptic and symbolic comic strip containing the message that the band had gone on hiatus.
_	President Ayub Khan also sent telegrams to Nehru and Sheikh Abdullah with the message that as Pakistan too was a party to the Kashmir dispute any resolution of the conflict without its participation would not be acceptable to Pakistan.
_	Implicit in the film is the message that homosexuality is desirable, and that the interviewees' only struggle is having their choices accepted and validated by the community."
_	The goal of Stop Wasting Food is to spread the message that it is economically irresponsible to dispose of edible food at any point in the food-production chain, from producers to shops and restaurants to homes.
_	Van Oppen explained that she and the other members of G.R.L. were unaware of what Battle was going through in the lead up to her death, so they wanted to spread the message that it was okay to talk about mental health and help people.
_	The film serves as a cultural critique – in Hansen's words, a "social statement" – sending the message that it is never a mistake to question our own assumptions about morality.
_	Cortés then sent emissaries to Moctezuma with the message that the people of Cholula had treated him with trickery and had therefore been punished.
_	It also relays the message that the living should move on, as the dead are in a new place and have changed souls.
_	That was essentially the message that Prof.
_	Her suit alleged "the regulations required her to send the message that she believes women are subservient to men."
_	WADA director general Olivier Niggli stated that his agency was "very concerned by the message that this sends whistleblowers for the future."
_	In 1261 there were some farmenn back from Greenland with the message that Greenlanders had committed itself to paying tax to the king.
_	All of these conditions essentially convey the message that tawba, in its purest form, consists of forgetting one’s sin.
_	He also attributes its popularity with the peasant culture of eighteenth and nineteenth century Ukraine to its egalitarian message conveyed by the placing of shepherds before the kings and conveying the message that the even the poorest and most wretched, like Jesus himself, find equality or even glory in the Christmas story.
_	Arriving for battle in the morning, he learns his new orders: he will observe the battle from a high parapet and, at the appropriate time, will use a powerful but poorly understood item known as the Witching Cloak to teleport himself to the ship with the message that the last defenders have fallen and they are on their own.
_	Instead, it has been found that acknowledging rewards send the message that the recipient is trusted, respected, and appreciated
_	The law makes it an offense to possess, produce, copy, import, or export pornography involving a child under 18 years of age, or to publish or cause to be published any advertisement that conveys or is likely to be understood as conveying the message that any person has published, publishes, or intends to publish any child pornography.
_	The novel, in its totality gives the message that we're all tied by the bondage of karma.
_	Later that night, Leroy (under the premise that Emma gave him the message that she found Regina) makes the announcement about the potion and Zelena gets up and walks out.
_	Abraham H. Foxman of the Anti-Defamation League called on Falk to resign as U.N. Rapporteur for the Palestinian territories saying that "This cartoon is blatantly anti-Semitic and conveys the message that Jews and Americans care little about what is just and moral" and that "the message of hatred in this cartoon nonetheless directly contravenes the principles of the Human Rights Council and of the United Nations itself."
_	Named "Goldie", the Ford Escort was a part of a fleet of art cars that featured sculptures of a corn cob, soybean, sugar beet, and tomato that were designed to appear cross-bred with a fish to humorously convey the message that unlabeled genetically engineered food was fishy.
_	The teamwork involved in caring for the motherless girl named Frankie conveys the message that "everyone's life is better when individuals, communities and governments work together to care for those in trouble".
_	As she describes it, after the last of her team was gone, she changed the message that was being transmitted into a distress call.
_	The song is a parody of club songs (former 'summer hits'), with the message that a song could become a hit even if the lyrics do not make any sense.
_	In 2014, Hugo Boss pledged to become fur-free publicly in their 2014 Sustainability Report, relaying the message that animal cruelty is never fashionable.
_	The girls transmitted the message that the city had been destroyed, to the confused disbelief of the officers receiving the message in Tokyo.
_	In 2010, it adopted TVB as its official name and refocussed on the message that local stations also offer television commercial time and space on a range of digital channels.
_	Warman said the appeal court's ruling "sends the message that those who try to use the cloak of free speech to poison other people's reputations through lies and defamation do so at their own peril."
_	At noon Wahinealoha returned with the message that a group of lepers were willing to surrender if Luther Wilcox were to meet with them.
_	The last lines of the film where Manju asks "what do you think of 'women's liberation'", Arun's wife answers, "I don't know", to which Manju says "that is why you are happy", send the message that one will inevitably get into trouble if one exhibits assertive behaviour.
_	According to the book of Jeremiah, during the reign of King Zedekiah, The Lord instructed Jeremiah to make a yoke of the message that the nation would be subject to the king of Babylon.
_	Minhas radioed PAF Base Masroor with the message that he was being hijacked.
_	The Sultan replied with the message that his aim is to "obtain a complete victory suited to his zeal for the honor of Islam and Musulmans".
_	The main aim of the event is "active leisure", and the message that is conveyed to each participant is that any history consists of heroes and their acts.
_	Thus, the message that persuades the most is the one that is most discrepant from the listener's position, yet falls within his or her latitude of acceptance or latitude of noncommitment.
_	Stefanie Spinks wrote that "by accepting $45,000 for her interview, Belle is sending the message that people can profit off stealing, lying and taking advantage of people's good intentions."
_	While being interviewed by Johnnie Cochran on Johnnie Cochran Tonight, La Salle commented, "We have to take care of the message that we're sending as African-Americans or any other group of minorities, that we have the exact same type of exchanges with our mates that we get to see our White counterparts have."
_	In an interview, Akhtar stated that he wanted to bring the campaign to education institutions, such as schools and colleges, "to drive home the message that women need to be respected."
_	Its tagline 'Kasali Ka' aims to convey the message that DZUP is not only for the UP community but also for everyone who actively participates in "matinong usapan para sa maunlad na bayan".
_	It delivers the message that condemning other people is wrong and that the Christian church is being too judgmental of pregnant teenagers.
_	One of the most emotional moments of this gala was the message that Diana Cano received from her mother who was in Ecuador, Diana cried and proved once again that she is not as cold and strong as she looks.
_	Interesting, the episode seems to have the message that just because killer whales can't talk it doesn't mean they don't have feelings and a right to be heard as an undertone.
_	But I think we need to send the message that the home is sacred ground, period."
_	The dark neck and the window joint line showed that as if the woman was being strangled, conveying the message that the Philippines was under stress.
_	He expressed his desire to commit jihad by sending the message that American soldiers would be killed, unless the country stopped its "war" against Islam, its War on Terror.
_	He engineered the table movements during the séance to make the spirit convey the message that Captain Trevelyan had been murdered.
_	Later, Nana Sahib was captured by a betrayer of one of the companions among the other leaders of the sepoys, but Bunro left him alive, publishing in the newspapers the message that Nana Sahib had surrendered his companions to the Englishmen and was pardoned for this, and fabricating a photo confirming this message.
_	From 1997 to 1999, Paul posed in his underpants only for magazines to spread the message that "laws are inherent to every people".
_	At the closing credits, the message that read "Madamo nga salamat, Kapuso! 1999-2007" (Thank you very much Kapuso) was shown on the screen capped with the Kapuso logo.
_	"Ankuram" ends with the message that citizens who can speak have the responsibility of speaking about the rights of the fellow citizens who can not speak.
_	On 24 August, delayed by combat and poor roads, Free French General Leclerc, commander of the 2nd French Armored Division, disobeyed his direct superior, American corps commander Major General Leonard T. Gerow, and sent a vanguard (the "colonne Dronne") to Paris, with the message that the entire division would be there the following day.
_	Sitting in his underwear at Dagwood’s house, Herschel gets the message that he is to report back to active duty.
_	"We're offering people an opportunity to play an active role in our future, sending the message that people can make a difference."
_	During the promotion of "MDI", the musician tried to convey the message that not all teenagers use drugs, alcohol or are depraved; she said that there are many teenagers who are interested in Social Welfare, Sustainable Development or Environmental Protection; she expressed her desire to become a spokeswoman for the teenagers.
_	Kerrigan stated in a letter dated November 25, 2005, that "to allow Stant to have the attack removed from his record would not only be an insult to her, but it [also] would send the message that a crime like that can ultimately be swept under the rug".
_	"We hold that these memorials have the impermissible effect of conveying to the reasonable observer the message that the state prefers or otherwise endorses a certain religion."
_	As soon as the majority of the first wave had departed, ships were made available for anyone else who wished to depart, however with the fear of ships being mobbed, riots amongst travellers and in the empty towns, with looting of empty houses and shops, as had happened in France on the Channel coast, the authorities pushed the message that 'staying was best', with posters saying “Don’t be yellow, stay at home”, (the "patriot" responsible for this poster fled to England).
_	Stuck in human form, Trauma is thrown aside into a car, and is left alive to carry on the message that Hulk has no fear.
_	O'Connor includes this line because she is not trying to convey the message that if someone has a traumatic experience, their life will be changed.
_	Ayham Kamel, a Middle East analyst, analyzed that the Syrian Army used Baba Amr to send the message that it was still the dominant force on the battleground.
_	Another telegraph was sent to Promontory with the message that the dignitaries would not arrive there until May 10.
_	Big Metal returns to his people with the message that the Apsaalooka people will survive only so long as the river winding out of the mountains is known as the Bighorn River.
_	"NoiZe" then made the unlikely move of recruiting Steve Weinstein to be their editor-in-chief, asking him to help get out the message that "noiZe" would still cover the circuit as well as emerging forms of gay entertainment and fundraising.
_	McSally's suit alleged that "the regulations required her to send the message that she believes women are subservient to men."
_	Two months earlier a photograph of three teachers held hostage was released by Islamic Jihad for the Liberation of Palestine with the message that it "would take revenge against" all institutions and organisations that insulted in one way or another "members of the Prophet Mohammed's family".
_	The goal was to send the message that the mayor and city council should be making large corporations pay higher taxes.
_	Campaigns such as 'No Dirty Gold' are driving the message that the mining industry is harmful (for the reasons noted above), and so must be cleaned up.
_	"Again and again the message that his plays leave with the attentive reader and spectator is one of the humanity, forgiveness, reconciliation, and a refusal to fall into the trap set by the violent to the nonviolent, of converting them to their own methods."
_	It is possible that he does this to include the message that "...all flesh ("or" all mankind) will see God's salvation" (6) to his Gentile audience.
_	Tipper, won't you understand the message that I want to say
_	The accused, V Chandra Mohan (22), spread the message that dog’s meat was found in Shah Ghouse restaurant.
_	The Weissers judge Oniroku Dan's story to be more objectionable than some of his others, with the message that a woman will choose submission and reject self-expression if given the choice, to be clearer than in his other scripts.
_	I’m hoping that is the message that anyone can take away from this film!"
_	The theme Light+HeART seeks to convey the message that “in the heart of the sustainability matters, is the matter of the heart”.
_	An internal report prepared around 1960 recommended that IBM end broad support for AI and so the company ended its AI program and began to aggressively spread the message that "computers can only do what they were told."
_	On 7 March 2008, the US Assistant Secretary of State for European and Eurasian Affairs, Daniel Fried, made an unscheduled visit to Skopje, with the message that the two sides must cooperate with Matthew Nimetz to find a mutually acceptable solution for the naming dispute.
_	Angara said that "we decided to use ‘Pinoy’ to send the message that this campaign is for all Filipinos."
_	Reflecting the changed media team of Ducros and Kinsella, after a minor cabinet reshuffle in the summer of 1999, a story was leaked from the PMO that the reshuffle was a "shot across the bow" that was intended to send the message that Chrétien would be seeking a third term, a message that Donolo felt was unwise as it was bound to provoke a response from the Martin camp.
_	A cub scout, Jimmy, comes across them and vows to help find the real Santa Claus and give him the message that the reindeer are in Central Park waiting for him.
_	William Irwin, author of "The Simpsons and Philosophy: The D'oh! of Homer", also praised the use of IRS in "Bart the Fink" to convey the message that "none of us can escape the unavoidable taxes".
_	The new format, known as Extended QWK but written as QWKE (pronounced "quick-ee"), added a series of "kludge lines" outside the header line of the message that allowed free-form text.
_	The use of log probabilities is widespread in several fields of computer science such as information theory and natural language processing as it represents the surprisal, the minimum length of the message that specifies the outcome in an optimally efficient code.
_	Soon Johanne came to believe that the spirits of the transcendental world had called upon her, and had given her the message that she was a medium, and that before her birth she had promised to be instrumental in bringing eternal truths to mankind.
_	At a news conference announcing the inaugural festival James H. Billington said, "We must all try, in every way we can, to send the message that reading is critical to our lives and to the life of our nation."
_	Harry passes on the message that Big would like her to call him, and that he has written to her frequently, but never received a reply.
_	I don't know exactly what he said, but he clearly communicated the message that Mr. Novak should not publish my name.
_	Since that time, the majority of the OECD countries which are signatories of the convention have revised their tax policies according to this recommendation and some have extended the measures to bribes paid to any official, sending the message that bribery will no longer be tolerated in the operations of the government.
_	Roosevelt cabled Ambassador W. Averell Harriman in Moscow on March 14, 1944 with the message that he had viewed the film, and found it so "beautifully and dramatically presented that it required little translation."
_	Henry calls but Hilda tells him that Betty is busy and throws away the message that he leaves with her.
_	The juror said that "the fact that Turner ran away after two Stanford graduate students noticed him on top of an unmoving woman" was compelling evidence along with the incoherence of the message that Doe left her boyfriend before meeting Brock.
_	The beauty pageant aims to convey the message that everything is "possible" for girls, even those with special needs.
_	The song's lyrics include the word "ganggangsullae", the name of a traditional Korean folk dance that brings people together in a large circle to dance and play; with the message that "true champions are the ones who know how to have fun."
_	Despite having almost lost a leg and being shot in the chest, she managed to travel around twenty-five miles to deliver the message that saved 194 men of the Lost Battalion of the 77th Infantry Division in the Battle of the Argonne, in October 1918.
_	SAMPEG promotes the message that South Australia’s resources potential is under-explored and that the State Government "is willing to back investors in the resources sector, in a strategic, tangible and substantial way, including subsidised drilling and new, free, pre-competitive data."
_	I think the arbitration committee wants to send the message that Wikipedians have to be neutral on all accounts and all fronts.
_	They reflect the message that the struggle is, at some level, a false construct - something entirely else is going on behind the scenes.
_	He then attempted contact with the Japanese on Kunashir, and was met with cannon fire and the message that the captured Russians were all dead.
_	“We're spreading the message that you need to stay in shape and keep working hard, because some type of treatment is going to come.
_	The film carried the message that violence does not pay, and is not the answer to the problems of today.
_	The encyclical helps to draw out the message that priests must concentrate on the Word on God and the benefitting of souls before their own selves.
_	In India, the leprosy program prioritized the message that "leprosy is curable, not hereditary" in order to inspire optimism in highly affected communities.
_	The episode emphasised the message that a shot deer should never be approached from the front.
_	Hoffer often promotes the message that "everything old is new again" - arguing that many of today's inventions are simply repackaged versions of old ideas.
_	When he passed the post office, and a saw a sign in several languages calling upon foreigners to learn English, and to attend night school, he was prepared for the message that was destined to change the entire course of his life.
_	It achieved a great deal of publicity for its message with a poster which went up across London showing a body made up of coins alongside the message that 'Your kindness could kill'.
_	The video visually shows the message that no matter how many drummers they had, and no matter how each beat was hit in time, they would never be the same as Jon.
_	The liner notes for "Revelation" state that the album art is "an artistic interpretation" of Salvation Mountain, a monument created by Leonard Knight as "a public art project designed to send the message that 'God Loves Everyone'".
_	Kidney Research UK say that "The purpose of World Kidney Day is to spread the message that kidney disease is common, harmful and treatable."
_	The initiative promotes the message that immunization of every child is vital in order to prevent diseases and protect life.
_	However, Beyond the Realm of Conscience is rather a series that carries the message that good (Lau Sam Ho, Charmaine Sheh) always beats evil (Yiu Kam Ling, Tavia Yeung.
_	The film uses a series of techniques to enhance the message that it was trying to send to those watching.
_	The division radio network became clogged with stations repeating the message that "Pompey's fallen in the Somme".
_	During the night, the desperate princess sent the maid to the knight with the message that she rescinded the obligation to ride around the walls and would marry him.
_	For instance, "The Sick Stag" gives the message that uncaring friends can do more harm than good.
_	As I’ve said many times, there is a whole slew of reasons why women do not come “on time” or perhaps at all – whether it’s that they are still doing the bulk of childcare and food preparation on Shabbat, whether they are still recovering from years of alienation and a private resistance that makes reading the paper on Shabbat morning very attractive, or whether they have internalized the message that if they don’t count for minyan, it doesn’t really matter if they come anyway.
_	“Every day, Israel Bonds emphasizes the message that Israel’s economy is dynamic, full of innovative spirit and groundbreaking entrepreneurship.
_	The purpose of this largest human flag is not only to break the previous world record, but also to spread the message that all Nepalese are under one flag.
_	"NRA4EVER", the message that appears on a cash register during the opening sequence reference in a trivia question, is a reference to the National Rifle Association.
_	The series conveys the message that "across all cultures, the kitchen is the beating heart of every household.
_	It has the message that It’s better to pursue the dream instead of following the money through the lyrics such as “ Why change your own color / why chase your green dollar.”
_	Rani receives a call from the Colpetty police station with the message that a girl from a bar fight said that Rani was her mother.
_	By the end of these conventions he had managed to convey the message that the idea and the ideals of outdated imperialism ought be dropped so that people within the national boundaries could make decisions in accordance with the principles and general guidelines of an effective national policy.
_	Along these lines, he stated: "When you have an underrepresentation of women as speakers and many panel discussions made up only of male researchers, you're sending the message that perhaps the field is not welcoming to women.
_	Timid poets usually succumb to the disco groove and walk off stage with head held down, but there are a confident few who feel empowered by the audience's interaction and do not seem to get the message that getting Car Wash Clapped is not a positive thing.
_	When a train arrives at the end of a block section, before the signalman sends the message that the train has arrived, he must be able to see the end-of-train marker on the back of the last vehicle.
_	The decision was first protested against by the Outer Mongol Khalkha nobles and then the Khalkhas sought to have him placed at a distance from them at Dolonnor, but Qianlong snubbed both of their requests, sending the message that he was putting an end to Outer Mongolian autonomy.
_	Butterfield expressed concern with the pending expiration, saying: “Allowing the current interest rates to expire would burden students with additional debt, prolong their ability to kick start their careers, and send the message that it is more important to cut taxes for the wealthy than educational expenses for our young people.
_	He continues, "I thought perhaps I should turn it into the message that, no matter what, we must express our 'sense of isolation from deep inside that won't let us smile.'"
_	The friendship of five fun-loving youngsters and spreads the message that "the goodness in your heart never goes unrewarded".
_	These signs often do not have much text on them, as they should be internationally understood due to the nature of the message that they are conveying.
_	Although the review in the "New York Times" called the film "the most brilliant picture yet this year" and praised Sturges's mix of escapist fun with underlying significance, "The Hollywood Reporter" said that it lacked the "down to earth quality and sincerity which made [Sturges's] other three pictures a joy to behold" and that "Sturges...fails to heed the message that writer Sturges proves in his script.
_	On 23 December 2013, Mollie King posted a photo on Instagram of her holding a 500,000 sales plaque from their record label, with the message that "What About Us" had sold over 500,000 copies in UK and USA, with 120,000 copies in the US alone even without charting on the "Billboard" Hot 100.
_	The language surrounding these laws conveys the message that such acts are supposedly immoral and should be condemned, even though there is no actual victim in these consenting relationships.
_	The next clip shows the Doctor saying goodbye; then he seems to change his mind, points the sonic screwdriver at the phone and deletes the message that he'd just left.
_	"Dr. Martin Luther King, Jr. asserted that civil rights are human rights, and that is the message that we take away from this film," said Steven W. Hawkins, Executive Director of Amnesty International USA.
_	A full 90 minutes of serious attitude, technological obsession, deception, and just plain meanness, this film appeals primarily to the preteen and teen audience and manages to convey the message that goodness and trust will prevail despite enormous odds.
_	She asserts that her cancer was caused by her emotional state, and preaches the message that a person's physical health is affected by their emotional well being.
_	Wesley was among Native American activists who expressed the belief that the Governor was sending "the message that the issue holds no importance to her.
_	In 2013 Miyazaki said the film was his favorite creation, explaining "I wanted to convey the message that life is worth living, and I don't think that's changed."
_	This album had a profound impact on dancehall music and proved that dancehall audiences had not forgotten the message that Roots Reggae expounded with the use of "conscious lyrics".
_	A report by Human Rights Watch said "Anti-Kiev forces in eastern Ukraine are abducting, attacking, and harassing people they suspect of supporting the Ukrainian government or consider undesirable...anti-Kiev insurgents are using beatings and kidnappings to send the message that anyone who doesn't support them had better shut up or leave".
_	Cooney, "Sesame Street" co-creator and president of the Children's Television Workshop (CTW), said, "He gave millions of children the message that the old and the young have a lot to say to each other".
_	Organized as a celebration of womanhood, the agenda was to spread the message that the streets are safe and free for women also in the night.
_	Moș Crăciun există, Moș Crăciun ești tu! - Is a campaign that promotes the message that each of us can be Santa by helping others.
_	Schweitzer writes that the many modern versions of Christianity deliberately ignore the urgency of the message that Jesus proclaimed.
_	Despite speculation and suggestions that the festivities be postponed or canceled, AMPAS president Pierson wrote in a "Variety" column refusing to take such action stating that it would send the message that "the terrorists have won".
_	The new talk show host has publicly defended her recent weight gain and attempts to deliver the message that being sexy has nothing to do with being thin or healthy.
_	"She wanted to put out the message that people come in all sizes- she wanted to put some balance out there.
_	His influence on Faces' 1971 album "A Nod Is as Good as a Wink... to a Blind Horse", which he co-produced with the band, can be gauged from the message that follows the credits:
_	Together they wanted to send out the message that TV drama must reflect everyone regardless of race, gender, class, sexual orientation or disability.
_	Your absence sends the message that you do not consider HIV/AIDS as a critical priority, and clearly all of us here disagree with you".
_	In fact, Stevens says that the display transmits the message that Texas specifically endorses the Judeo-Christian values of the display and thus, the display violates the establishment clause.
_	Peter Stokes, chief executive of Christian group Salt Shakers said "It just saddens me that we give our young people the message that these relationships are OK".
_	Alternative for Germany party organisers sent out the message that they are not trying to attract right-wing radicals, and toned down rhetoric on their Facebook page following media allegations that it too closely evoked the language of the far-right.
_	Holoran stated that Hunter's series marked a "tipping point" in the history of web video which "sent the message that online video [... is ...] a serious medium, ready to contend with traditional media for audiences and ad dollars."
_	David had Uriah himself carry the message that led to his death.
_	The subject of the stories themselves carry a lot of criticism against war and the absurdity of military bureaucracy and mentality and (also by references to Joseph Heller's "Catch 22" and to Robert Altman's "M*A*S*H") also the message that "civilian" life isn't much different from military life, disguised.
_	Meade reiterated the message that articles must be broad enough in scope to interest the more than 5,000 members, nearly half of whom taught in secondary schools.
_	Each of these works entailed appropriating existing imagery and collaging it, using it as is, or restaging it in such a way that shows our internalization of the message that the media was selling us.
_	Kyle refuses, and after Neron defeats him in battle he spares his life, giving Kyle the message that what he covets most is " 'a far more noble soul' " who Kyle knows and that when he has it, Earth will be his.
_	The organization also stated that "by wearing Tanooki, Mario is sending the message that it's OK to wear fur."
_	Rather, he said, media should focus on emphasizing Chinese culture and the Chinese way of life "to convey the message that China is a friend, not an enemy".
_	For this edition, the message that was conveyed was "We are all responsible for universal heritage".
_	Aguinaldo sent a ranking member of his staff to Elwell Stephen Otis, the U.S. military commander, with the message that the firing had been against his orders.
_	Basically, it was the message that the priest of ECAR Ste Dorothée Soamahamanina passed to the faithful of this place, which had become "historical" as well as to the peers of Augustin Andriamananoro, in this case his family and the members of the MAPAR.
_	The movie ends with the message that love do not die.
_	Initiative to share the message that now is the time.
_	It can also lead to many Ghanaians' belief in an exaggerated white goodness, that because Jesus is white then all whites must be good because Jesus is good, and it pushes along the message that darkness and blackness is bad, therefore they are bad, and this can often lead to many Ghanaians performing whiteness to seem and be more successful, attractive, and good.
_	Thus, during this time span, both agents have active copies of the message that they will try to deliver.
_	The BBC then broadcast the message that the islands had been declared "open towns", after Prime Minister Winston Churchill refused to announce the demilitarisation through diplomatic channels, and later in the day reported the German bombing of the island.
_	The king of Assyria became disturbed at the message that Jonah preached.
_	After Malcolm reads an upcoming inquiry report that incriminates Hugh badly; he decides to send the message that the government won't "throw a good man out to the wolves over one single little fuck-up.".
_	It tries to tell the message that whatever you do, you have done nothing unless you positively affect your brother".
_	The Hungarian Oil and Gas Public Limited Company, MOL, has joined the foundation, give due weight to the message that, just like one of the most successful companies of Hungarian economy, this prize requires the utmost attention both locally and worldwide.
_	Sigurd understands the last bits of the message that hadn't made sense before - it was this creature that was being described.
_	Later, Khan receives a money order for Rs. 100 that Ajay had taken from him with the message that he could not steal the honest earnings of an officer.
_	However, once that period had passed users were greeted with a single page with the message that the site was now closed and would resurface within the next few days as a museum.
_	For example: "You're welcome" is not intended to convey the message that the hearer is welcome; it is a phatic response to being thanked, which in turn is a phatic whose function is to acknowledge the receipt of a benefit.
_	He instead writes a letter to Robyn containing the message that he must leave her.
_	The documentary centers on the message that the Aztecan traditional healing system still exists to this day.
_	According to journalist Ian Black, the attack seemed intended to send the message that Israeli attacks on its enemies, either in Gaza, Lebanon or Syria would not go unanswered.
_	Prevention of such "ESTA fee scams" was made more difficult when the mandatory US Government fee was imposed, as previous public education efforts focused on getting out the message that ESTA applications were free of charge and anybody requesting payment was an unauthorized third-party.
_	Smarting from the fallout over his acceptance of a Grand Cross of the German Eagle from Nazi Germany, Ford asked Franklin to disseminate the message that he wished to hire displaced European Jews.
_	She relayed the message that he had been drafted by the Atlanta Braves in the first round, the 35th selection overall.
_	Their use as instruments of state power sent the message that the ruler was able to preside over very powerful creatures who were under total command.
_	In the late 1980s a party of European trekkers were robbed and ordered to return to Huaraz with the message that future intruders would be killed.
_	His messengers gave him the message that Singh got "afraid" by the happenings in Amber and Jodhpur and thought that his kingdom would also be annexed by the emperor.
_	It would also send the message that reducing the number of stops is somehow dangerous to the residents of this city."
_	This also convey the message that Hong Kong is a place where the Chinese and Western cultures meet.
_	The dissent argued "The effect on minority religious groups, as well as on those who may reject religion, is to convey the message that their views are not similarly worthy of public recognition nor entitled to public support.
_	The Tel Aviv Arts Council organizes performances, lectures on art history, and cultural events that combine art and social networking in an effort to promote Israeli art and convey the message that Israeli innovation goes beyond technology.
_	A counterpoint to Cameron's stance on homosexuality, the humorous video aimed to spread the message that gay individuals are not a threat to anyone.
_	To drive home the message that Waters had left the band, the inner gatefold featured a group photograph – of just Gilmour and Mason – shot by David Bailey.
_	She further argues that the novel's motif of facial recognitions amounts to the message that people should be read "at face value", and that furthermore, past action is the greatest indicator of future behaviour, leaving no room for "change, growth, [or] self-reinvention".
_	Naomi Paiss, Director of Communications, described the campaign as "a tactic that embodies the message that Israel cannot and will not change itself, and for that reason, we think it is inflammatory and counter-productive".
_	Soon afterwards he received the message that the 'extra' had passed Shohola; but it was too late.
_	The Danes put Óttarr's corpse on a mound to be devoured by wild beasts, and made a wooden crow that they sent to Sweden, with the message that the wooden crow was all that Óttarr was worth.
_	Closed loop communication is another important technique used to ensure that the message that was sent is received and interpreted by the receiver.
_	The angels had the claws of birds instead of hands and feet, and they were dressed in surplices of white linen and tight pants, and they pulled the Devil's food away from the children's hands, cried tears as big as peas, and asked them to confess so the witches could be exterminated and send the message that one should not have to work on Thursdays, nor use shirts with frilled sleeves, and not have to sell tobacco above its fairest price.
_	The references to most of the author's personal problems, which peppered her adult book, have been removed, and Dewey's story stands on its own... astute readers will also pick up on the message that a town's heart beats strongest in its library."
_	Indoctrination consists of the message that a totalitarian government promotes internally, to the members of the ruling party and that segment of the population which supports the government.
_	Propaganda consists of the message that a totalitarian government seeks to promote in the outside world, and also among those parts of its own society which may not support the government.
_	Their lordships were so taken with the message that it was circulated throughout the fleet.
_	Spinal Cord Injury Zone stated: "Instead of tugging at the heartstrings, "The Ringer" uses the typical outrageous Farrelly Brothers humor ("There's Something About Mary", "Stuck on You", "Shallow Hal") to promote the message that just like everyone else, individuals with intellectual disabilities are people first, each with their own interests, talents, abilities and personalities.
_	Another popular legend concerns the Han Chinese's uprising against the ruling Mongols at the end of the Yuan dynasty (1280–1368 CE), in which the Han Chinese used traditional mooncakes to conceal the message that they were to rebel on Mid-Autumn Day.
_	The film reinforced the message that civilians should be vigilant against fifth columnists and that "careless talk costs lives".
_	The Deputy Chief Minister of Guernsey also attended the UK Liberal Democrats conference in 2012 to communicate the message that "Guernsey and the Channel Islands are good neighbours to the UK".
_	Some claim Kamber resigned over unfounded allegations that representatives of AUA along with Fawzi Hariri of KDP met with American Congresswoman Anna Eshoo, sending the message that Assyrians do not have the numbers to create an autonomous zone in the Nineveh plains.
_	He opposed the placement of what he called "a monument to Jewish law" in a government building and saw it as an attempt to send the message that "Jewish Supremacism is the law" despite several Jewish organizations coming out against the placement of the commandments because they flouted the separation of church and state when placed in a judicial building.
_	He also played an important role in the 1992 Canadian referendum where he crafted the message that the doom of Canada would be the certain result of a "No" vote.
_	During the third dream, she was delivered the message that, “I did not have to work in the factory, but I could learn to work for myself and earn for my family.”
_	"So far, the message that Hollywood seems to have taken from the incredible success of "Bridesmaids" is a predictably reductive one, something along the lines of: Hey, look!
_	In response, Ashraf had Sultan Husayn's head cut off and sent it to the Ottoman with the message that "he expected to give Ahmad Pasha a fuller reply with the points of his sword and his lance".
_	L.V. Anderson of "Slate" wrote that "Title" perpetuated a retrograde belief about relationships and deemed Trainor a poor role model, and opined, "Once again she is sending the message that a woman's worth is defined by men".
_	As stated, many films pushed the message that criminals were the result of a poor moral and economic society, and many are portrayed as having foreign backgrounds or coming from the lower class.
_	The play intended to convey the message that "money could not buy peace of mind".
_	Others consider abortion of fetuses with disabilities a form of discrimination, arguing that abortion after a positive diagnosis sends the message that a life with disability is not worth living.
_	Sarwo Edhie sent Sudiro back with the message that he will side with Suharto.
_	They represent the following prophets and the message that each prophet carries to the people: Abraham, Elijah.
_	Chief executive of the Christian group Salt Shakers, Peter Stokes, told "The Age's" Kenneth Nguyen, "It just saddens me that we give our young people the message that these relationships are OK."
_	"The purpose of the film is presumably to sell more toys as it unashamedly pushes the message that without at least one Care Bear around life can be very lonely."
_	Some audience may even think that the actual purpose of the show is to bring out the message that children are smarter than adults.
_	Further perceived negative impact comes from American and British officials only receiving and broadcasting the message that they are succeeding in Afghanistan, even in spite of the beliefs of U.S. Marine Major Bill Steuber, the commanding officer of the police advisory team.
_	However, the message that the tail carries to the potential mate peahen may be 'I have survived in spite of this huge tail; hence I am fitter and more attractive than others'.
_	Ruth had her bat mitzvah in 1998, saying that it sent the message that "We are not going to finish Hitler's work for him.
_	A report by Human Rights Watch said "Anti-Kiev forces in eastern Ukraine are abducting, attacking, and harassing people they suspect of supporting the Ukrainian government or consider undesirable...anti-Kiev insurgents are using beatings and kidnappings to send the message that anyone who doesn't support them had better shut up or leave".
_	The workshop, which features powerful videos with speakers from the three Abrahamic faiths, enables participants over half a day to understand the importance of their own role in spreading the message that faith matters, and that the true values of the Abrahamic faiths are love, forgiveness, respect and understanding.
_	The permanence and pain associated with a tattoo creates a unique message, indicating to a reader of the message that the speaker is highly committed to the message he or she is displaying.
_	The kits carry the message that you don’t have to be an expert to help someone.
_	When all on-duty pilots are present, the squadron commander informs Air Plot of this with the message that "Ready room N is manned and ready."
_	It sends the message that she is an object to be possessed by men, which is disturbingly what we see in real violence cases".
_	The deal sent the message that the Blue Jays were committed to winning.
_	Hawthornden attributed the defeat to a misunderstanding; Sinclair was tasked only to deliver the message that Maxwell was in command, and when he was raised up to speak, the anxious army thought he had been made leader.
_	The band also claimed in the message that the reason for this release was due to contractual obligations, rather than by choice.
_	However, fans were getting the message that a new show similar to "New.Music.Live." would arrive during Fall 2013 based on tweets sent on "NML"'s Twitter feed.
_	A male who takes a physical risk is sending the message that he has enough strength and skill to survive extremely dangerous activities.
_	As a result of this renewed attention, at the age of 85 West finally finished a second novel, entitled "The Wedding", which portrayed the message that while race may be a false distinction, love knows no bounds.
_	Knives and daggers were used to kill, and sometimes as a warning, a knife would be placed onto the pillow of a Sunni, who understood the message that he was marked for death.
_	Haig was sent the message that the prince ‘was killed by a shell whilst gallantly leading his company forward to attack across a ridge, east of Zonnebeke’.
_	My Choice brings the voices of survivors of sexual exploitation to the forefront in the fight against commercial sexual exploitation of children; collecting and harnessing the resilience of a collective group of survivors and allies to strengthen the message that this crime is unacceptable.
_	Michael looks for the funeral owner to ask for help, but he sends him away with the message that it is his own fault.
_	The Smilkovci lake killings (12 April 2012), government rocket attack (28 October 2014), Gošince attack (21 April 2015) and Kumanovo clashes (9–10 May 2015) were claimed by the National Liberation Army, which gave the message that "We do not want any framework agreement and if we see you here again, we will kill you.
_	The club conducts traffic awareness programs, propagates civic sense and the importance of road safety, and conveys the message that speeding and reckless driving is an antisocial behavior.
_	Crawford is discussed in Warren Goulding's book, "Just Another Indian, A Serial Killer and Canada's Indifference" with the message that crimes by marginalized minorities go unheeded by an uncaring society at large.
_	The outcome is that the tabloid press, talkback radio hosts and callers, right-wing think-tanks, victims groups and some evangelising police chiefs spread the message that the solution to crime is 'zero tolerance'.
_	in contrast with "What Makes the Red Man Red", however, the offensive lyrics in "Savages" are sung by the villains of the movie, to illustrate the message that racism is wrong.
_	Alan is arrested again by the "Tonton Macoutes", tortured, and dumped on a street with the message that he must leave Haiti or be killed.
_	His teammates helped his wife deliver the message that she was pregnant and filmed the moment.
_	Historically, the details of the ratio have varied, but the message that government and the courts must err on the side of innocence has remained constant.
_	Pierre receives a rifle with the message that he must never forget the innocent blood which has been spilled.
_	Despite the differences in information concepts, all of the publications carry the message that culture is a balancing act between the mindset devoted to the exploitation of natural resources and that, which conserves them.
_	When they arrive in Manchester the reference to the colliery and the gas works further put forward the message that Bubbles has come a long way since he was a boy, but that even now after his success he isn't really fulfilled.
_	John the Baptist has just been introduced and this verse describes the message that he is preaching.
_	"The overarching goals for the strategies for communicating are to help decrease defensiveness on the part of the loved one that you are speaking to, and increase the chances that your message is really going to be heard—so, increasing the ability that you have to really get across the message that you want."
_	An official from the time of the creation of the capsule who had been involved in the drafting of a message to be included within the capsule was able to remember word for word the message that was written which by all accounts contained a theme of hope for the future.
_	Not long afterwards, an SFPD helicopter flies in and broadcasts the message that Maxwell's demands have been met.
_	He brings the message that John must surrender or his mother will hang for his crimes.
_	By displaying backpacks with personal stories that put a ‘face' to lives lost to suicide, Send Silence Packing carries the message that preventing suicide is not just about lowering statistics, but about saving the flesh and blood lives of students, daughters, sons, brothers, sisters, and friends across the nation.
_	The book gives the message that the youths should dedicate themselves to what they like.
_	A significant reference made by Vivekananda was to the saying from the Bible (Mathew 8:20, Luke 9:58) to stress the message that renouncing worldly matters is the way to salvation:
_	Some time after, Eitumātupua sent a woman to fetch Ahoeitu, but she returned with the message that the boy was not to be found.
_	Included in every news story was the message that the images are a vital piece of history, but more than this, they contain scientific data of a time, place, and quality that has not been repeated.
_	We came with the message that we reject the ‘feminism’ of the Minister for Women and that that there is another type of feminism on offer.
_	The song conveys the message that the most important things in the world are health and life.
_	The ACF sends the tape, with the message that they shall continue the kidnap of the corrupt officers in all the departments and that the No. 1 corrupt shall be sentenced to death according to the law of the Anti Corruption Force.
_	Banai (Ganga) has a quarrel with Mhalsa (Parvati), ultimately ending with the message that both are the same.
_	Bob Geldof launched a series of music concerts during the G8 Summit to drive home the message that people wanted to eradicate poverty.
_	Howard gets separated from Bella and meets Sam, who had sent Howard the message that brought him here.
_	The legal memos condoning "enhanced interrogation" had "redefined torture", "distorted the meaning and intent of anti-torture laws, [and] rationalized the abuse of detainees", conveying the message that "physical pressures and degradation were appropriate treatment."
_	This was the message that appeared on 6 December 1997 Indie Chart:
_	In an April 12 press release (following the storming of the administration building by protestors), Shalala condemned the actions of the protestors, and stated: "it was the student organization STAND that delivered the message that [the outside protestors] were not welcome on campus today."
_	On 24 August, General Leclerc sent a small advance party to enter the city, with the message that the Second Armored would be there the following day.
_	Each process receives the message that is broadcast (the root already has the message) and then sends the message to its children.
_	Amidst the backdrop of lavish musical productions, she finally finds love and acceptance in the USSR, providing the message that racial tolerance can only be found in the Soviet Union.
_	The company stated its name change was “part of its re-branding initiative to reinforce the message that it is fully committed to the world of “digital” – which includes social, mobility, analytics, and cloud; automation; and Internet of Things technologies.
_	"Al-Shabab [sic] are looking for relevance on an international scale – especially after a change of leadership – and is looking to send the message that they are still a force to be reckoned with."
_	"He checked my references, got the message that I was a troublemaker, and said, 'You're one of us, you're one of the pirates'."
_	Edwards tries to reinforce the message that the helicopter rescue is important and stations Stacy and his crew at the farthest base, near the enemy lines.
_	Following his fun, Bean heads to a local Christmas market, where he meets up with his girlfriend, Irma Gobb, and is dragged to the shop window of a jeweller's, whereupon she tries to give him the message that she wants a sparkly ring in the display by pointing to a portrait of a couple getting engaged.
_	Then Ayia Napa Mayor Antonis Tsokkos said the aim of the event was to send the message that the village was interested in Greek culture and to promote the tourist resort abroad.
_	acknowledgements are 128-bit hashes of the message that are
_	These experts are people who spread the message that Islam is an inherently sinister and hostile religion that seeks to convert or destroy all non- Muslims, especially those residing in the United States.
_	Justice O'Connor further noted that: "[B]izarre shape and noncompactness cause constitutional harm insofar as they convey the message that political identity is, or should be, predominantly racial.
_	Maybe it’s time to send the message that they can party and still love Jesus.”
_	President Bush wanted to convey the message that the United States and its allies would not agree to anything less than a full withdrawal of Kuwait.
_	This sends the message that they aren't worth the attention.
_	Leung Chun-ying questioned if Kenneth Leung wanted to be the "screenwriter, director and actor in presenting the message that the chief executive is under investigation".
_	According to The Skeptic's Dictionary, "In the United States, the Federal Trade Commission requires Amway to label its products with the message that 54% of Amway recruits make nothing and the rest earn on average $65 a month."
_	Although "The Indian Express" spoke positively of the cinematography and the film's story, it noted that "the message that the film carries with it tends to get diluted towards the climax.
_	Nagari or Devanagari representations are found epigraphically on medieval sculpture, such as the dancing Shiva (ca. 10th to 12th century); Joseph Campbell (1949) even argued that the dance posture itself can be taken to represent "AUM" as a symbol of the entirety of "consciousness, universe" and "the message that God is within a person and without".
_	The purpose was to send out the message that the priests were not condemned for their faith but for conspiring against the Queen, an accusation which they adamantly denied.
_	He considered it to be the central Disney film and the most strongly middle class, intended to relay the message that indulging in "the pleasures of the working class, of vaudeville, or of pool halls and amusement parks, led to a life as a beast of burden".
_	The Fairy Godmother blesses the royal couple with the message that "There's Music in You", as they are cheered by their joyful subjects.
_	Major Huglin and the Marvins are released with the message that the aliens want to meet with the world's leaders in 56 days in Washington, D.C. to negotiate an occupation of Earth.
_	Following the publication of the Balfour Declaration the British had dispatched Commander David George Hogarth to see Hussein in January 1918 bearing the message that the "political and economic freedom" of the Palestinian population was not in question.
_	According to Wolstencroft, the inclusion of Helen's death was to give the audience the message that "the world of Spooks isn't the world where the cavalry always arrive, because in reality these people [MI5] do risk their lives on our behalf and they do get into sticky situations with genuinely nasty people."
_	The original version of the song in track 1 is arranged and produced by all the members together, conveying the message that Denise wants to express - "living in unity".
_	When Young Allies members Firestar and Gravity fight Electro, he defeats them and lets them live so that they can spread the message that he does not endorse Aftershock and the Bastards of Evil's terrorism.
_	She accidentally read the message that Mick gave to her for his friends as "I can't wait to introduce my girl from Australia" instead of "I can't wait to introduce my girl to Australia".
_	Prior to Week 8 against Detroit, Sherman nicknamed himself Optimus Prime, an action intended to send out the message that he would shut down Detroit's wide receiver, Calvin Johnson, known by his nickname Megatron.
_	It's the message that we send to the audience that really counts."
_	They were also met by Rowett's agent, with the message that they should return to England.
_	"The Smoking Gnu", a group of clacks-crackers, sets up a plan to send a Discworld equivalent to a killer poke into the clacks system that will destroy the machinery, halting the message that Lipwig will race against.
_	On September 14 and 15, he conveyed the message that "We cannot change what the president has already decided" at the beginning of a long but fruitless dialogue with leaders of CIDOB and the Subcentral TIPNIS.
_	The point of the video is the message that copyright infringement of software will cause the computer and video game industry to lose profit, resulting in halted production of further computer games.
_	Captain De Rosa told the passengers that the Palestinians had told him to relay an apology and the message that they had never intended to hijack the ship, "They had an assignment to do something in Israel."
_	The paragraph in the message that addressed nullification was:
_	Dessa is very outspoken about the message that the Stolpersteine sends in contemporary society:
_	The book imparts the message that the participant's life "doesn't work", and that after two weekends the individual will come to understand how to "win".
_	Michael Simms, founder of Linux Game Publishing, also at one point commented on the matter, stating that "although I wasn't a fan of the gameplay in "Postal 2", I loved the message that the company was trying to put out.
_	She spoke to and left the awestruck Elminster with the message that he should learn of magic and worship her.
_	Another function of the CRC field is to ensure the sender and receiver both agree in the message that is being transferred.
_	These principles were meant to convey the message that the South does not wish to absorb the North or to undermine its government; its goal was peaceful co-existence rather than regime change.
_	I only want to spread the message that Muslims should be allowed to leave Islam behind without being threatened".
_	Upon entering, Sam is berated for agreeing to be the Liaison Officer of their pod, but he is "rescued" by the call of the Vorta in command of the station, and upon entering a ball, is confronted by a Founder, with the message that he is to be given command of a ship.
_	Finally getting the message that Whitney is not interested in him, Moose leaves Walford.
_	Nils pretends to side with Leo Blue, in order to give Elisha the message that Toby has returned.
_	In a counter-argument by Lewis Denby of Gamasutra, he said that the game does not try to send the message that women's genitals are "filthy and disease-ridden", but rather was a "great idea" due to its focus on sexual education, calling the article "tremendously bad reporting", but ultimately admitting that "the author has a point" and that humorous games about "serious issues" will always be open to criticism.
_	The story was planned in part from the conclusion of Snyder and Capullo's work on "Death of the Family", and Snyder wanted to convey the message that Joker and Batman's bond had been broken, by having the Joker turn Batman's closest allies against him, the Justice League.
_	Women start to internalize the message that they are not individual human beings, but objects of beauty, pleasure, and play for men, and they start to look at themselves and their bodies as such.
_	Any method of writing the message that allows two distinct representations for each character can be used for the Bacon Cipher.
_	By borrowing the conventions of popular music, the antithesis of this stereotype, the Church restated the claims of the Bible through Christian lyrics, and thus sent the message that Christianity was not outdated or irrelevant.
_	Owing to its bee and garden symbolism, which Kartika Suardana suggests is intended to convey the message that "both sexes naturally need each other", oleg is often referred to as "the dance of the bumblebees".
_	To put "lipstick on a pig" is a rhetorical expression, used to convey the message that making superficial or cosmetic changes is a futile attempt to disguise the true nature of a product or person.
_	The importance of the uniform is derived from part of Dr. Cobbley’s education philosophy that "students get the message that proper behavior is expected and recognized through dress standards and good manners."
_	In the book, the couple share their personal love story, and the message that waiting until marriage can help you find the person you are meant to be with.
_	"Even a worm will turn" is an expression used to convey the message that even the meekest or most docile of creatures will retaliate or seek revenge if pushed too far.
_	Also in 1961, Davis made the film "Seduction of the Innocent", targeting teenagers with the message that marijuana use leads to heroin addiction, a message that many marijuana activists dispute as an example of a slippery slope fallacy.
_	Change felt that she "need[ed] to do something sensational that will make headline news and people will have to stop and talk about me and the message that I'm trying to put out."
_	The two nearly identical billboards showed the downtown areas of each convention city in a cross hairs, with the message that "when only one nuclear bomb could destroy a city" like Minneapolis or Denver, "we don't need 6,000."
_	"The New York Times" reported that Jagland shrugged off the question of whether "the committee feared being labeled naïve for accepting a young politician's promises at face value", stating that "no one could deny that 'the international climate' had suddenly improved, and that Mr. Obama was the main reason...'We want to embrace the message that he stands for."
_	Robinson chose Atlas because "she embodies the message that there is a strength in diversity.
_	Begun in Belgium, the Cage campaign has since visited 30 countries with the message that the waste produced by one family over the course of five years from beverage containers – 10,657 bottles and cans – can be replaced by a single SodaStream bottle.
_	The release of the Kindle coincided with a relaunch of the company's brand in the same month, pushing the message that the chain was the 'nation's leading bookshop' and producing an exclusive anthology, the "Waterstones Red Anthology", to help promote the shops.
_	The film ends with the message that "it's not too late to make a difference."
_	In a mailbox, he leaves her the message that he intended to kill her stepfather, but even on these messages, the distance remains.
_	In February 1849 he drew some comfort from Harriet Martineau's new "Eastern Life, Past and Present", a travelogue of tombs with the message that Christian beliefs in reward and punishment were founded in heathen superstitions.
_	A regular column called "Voices from Prison" highlighted the plight of those behind bars and reinforced the message that good work was being done on the behalf of the so-called "class war prisoners" of America.
_	Hutch wanted to convey the message that its service was robust enough to provide coverage in every part of its coverage areas.
_	Nevertheless, Qianlong snubbed both of their requests, sending the message that he was putting an end to Outer Mongolian autonomy.
_	Hate groups—which once recruited members through word of mouth and distribution of pamphlets—spread the message that one race is inferior, target a historically oppressed group, and use degrading, hateful terms.
_	The planters believed they could ensure control of the message that whites would deliver.
_	It was created by Leonard Knight to convey the message that "God Loves Everyone".
_	Produced during Ronald Reagan's first term as president, the Eagle Force toy line was marketed as a counter-terrorist task force, to send the message that the United States wasn't going to be "pushed around" anymore.
_	These souvenirs carry the message that Plaza Mexico is a place where cultural and religious(Catholicism) expression exists.
_	There are some square stone pillars which carries the message that can be translated as: 'Pi tai will look after Cheung Chau and will bring calm seas and good weather'.
_	Inside was a letter with the message that when translated would read, "Who is your Thorn of the road?
_	The movie comes out with the message that it's your wish to choose your gender.
_	According to Royer, the last scene, which shows the man who has aged, explains the whole video: the father figure was revealed throughout the magician, and conveys the message that only a father "can detect distress of his daughter" and help her to maintain balance when in doubt.
_	That by Joseph Rodman Drake, written before 1820, is a short lyric in octosyllabics with the message that shared suffering will lead to shared redemption beyond the grave.
_	On February 5, 2013, the band announced on their website and Facebook page their new bass player Steven Wussow, along with the message that they would have entered the studio again for their next studio album the same year.
_	Part of this job requires trying to crack the message that the artifact has sent.
_	"Rae" can do enormous computations in her head while working with others or pretending to sleep, and soon becomes convinced that the message that the artifact emitted is meant for herself.
_	"Because children are the present that we must all protect," was the message that began to spread through the Zebras Urban Educators Program, educating with values in the squares of the macrodistricts on Saturdays.
_	Colbert and Ban condition the senses of the visitors to facilitate their psychological entry into the space of the photographs, to deliver the message that man is not, and cannot be, separate from the nature within which he evolved...
_	The campaign is conducted online; the message that visitors are invited to sign states:
_	Grey, director of the Ford stock car program, felt that hiring Petty would send the message that "money rules none".
_	He finished the half marathon in 2:03:49 and is spreading the message that "It doesn't matter what others say or do, your only limit is your mind!"
_	General Leclerc sent a small advance party to enter Paris, with the message that the 2e DB (composed of 10,000 French, 3,600 Maghrebis and about 350 Spaniards in the 9th company of the 3rd Battalion of the "Régiment de Marche du Tchad" made up mainly of Spanish Republican exiles) would be there the following day.
_	In an interview with Reel Gospel, Tedashii explained that beyond dealing with suffering the album is also "a reflection on the fall, the result of the fall", and that the message that he is sharing on this album is that "We live in a fallen world with a loving God...
_	Although an extreme response, the 99 call was only used once (according to McBride), as it sent out the message that the Lions were willing and more than able to respond in kind and protect themselves.
_	An alternative CCM and adult contemporary song, "Does Anybody Hear Her" relates the story of a girl who is being pushed away by the Christian church as well as the message that condemning other people (in a harsh, unloving manner) is wrong.
_	In a lecture at City Church of San Francisco McGrath said that his interview was cut because he said things that did not promote the message that Dawkins and the producers wanted to get across.
_	They are used to send the message that drug dealers forfeit all their glamorous trappings when they get caught.
_	Having received the message that the prince Vladimir Andreevich was coming to help Moscow, Algirdas returned to Lithuania.
_	And I just think the vehemence and the virulence of the message that comes out of the radio station is a very unhelpful thing for Australia.
_	Like other Funk works, the ceramics also used funny and absurd styles and images to relay the message that people should not take art or themselves too seriously.
_	Nevertheless, he noted that "Journalist" was not only much more piercing than other "feuilletonist" films, but also much more pessimistic: there is no happy end, as the film ends with the message that the establishment always prevails - crushing its opposition in the process - and that the system cannot be fixed.
_	Ayia Napa Town Mayor Antonis Tsokkos said the aim of the event was to send the message that the village was interested in Greek culture and to promote the tourist resort abroad.
_	Participating in Rivers Day helps to spread the message that rivers are vital to maintain a healthy ocean and a healthy earth.
_	The images of skinny celebrities in the media also convey the message that being thin is a form of acceptance.
_	Frank promises not to tell Janet, but as they resume, Riff Raff interrupts on the television monitor with the message that Rocky has escaped.
_	Later, they are asked about the content of either the message they were asked to attend to or the message that they were not told to listen to.
_	Cornyn encountered similar problems with Joni Mitchell—he penned an advertisement that was meant to convey the message that Mitchell was yet to achieve significant market penetration, but the tag-line -- "Joni Mitchell is 90% Virgin"—reportedly reduced Mitchell to tears and Cornyn had to withdraw it from publication.
_	Congressional Republicans refused to release the evidence behind the assertion, but "ABC News" obtained a copy of the message that Republicans were referring to and noted that the message that refers to a "secret society" may have been made in jest.
_	Attendants were sent back to Oba Ewuare to inform him that his son had founded a kingdom at Uronmun and Ewuare sent them back with the message that the new king should bear the title Ijesan (the king of Esan).
_	The dignitaries present at Old Trafford paid tribute to the message that the game sent out about unity and the importance of a united Europe.
_	Some he tortured, some he killed and he cut off the hands of others, sending them back into the city with the message that he would do likewise to all Jerusalem if his wife was not released.
_	At that same revival meeting, Aimee became enraptured not only by the message that Robert Semple gave, but also with Robert.
_	However, the Emperor of Heaven, taking pity on the starving people of the Earth, and wishing to help them, sent the Oxen with the message that if they worked hard, they would starve no more, and that they could be sure to have a meal at least every three days.
_	Ronquillo de Peñalosa, the governor-general of the Philippines, sent galleons to Peru in 1581 and 1582 carrying the message that trade with Manila was illegal.
_	In this Roadblock the team member had to decipher the message that was being communicated by the ship commander from the top of the battleship in semaphore.
_	The president suffered terrible blows, sending the message that laissez-faire policies were not desired.
_	However, he expressed concern that the development would send the message that similar projects should convey "a false sense of worth" by being similarly dramatic.
_	J without makeup, in an effort to spread the message that beauty truly is on the inside.
_	Hulu's mission is to spread the message that Hong Kong is an interesting and colorful big city to a worldwide audience through its efforts to promote traditional culture and heritage.
_	This leaves us with the message that our prosperity and even our very existence required past violence and destruction; as Wink puts it, "We are the outcome of deicide."
_	Watson called such machines "calculators" because "computer" then referred to humans employed to perform calculations and he "wanted to convey the message that IBM's machines were not designed to replace people.
_	Harrison adds that the song specifically espouses the message that "we are not these bodies, we are "in" these material bodies in the physical world."
_	On 15 December 1956, after the failure of Operation Harvest and the introduction of the Special Powers Act, Charlie Murphy and Seán Cronin visited to convey the message that his usefulness to the IRA was over.
_	"The Terri-Quinn plot sends the message that the devious gender will use every trick to lure and trap its mate — including lying about pregnancy."
_	Gingrich has stated he believes that the U.S. should push the message that "America stands for freedom".
_	This story also conveys the message that truth, virtue, devotion and genuine compassion will always be protected by God.
_	The Bush administration did not respond to the proposal, although in March 2004 President Bush sent Mohamed ElBaradei to Tehran with the message that "an Iranian representative with the authority to make a deal should go to the U.S. and Bush himself would personally lead" negotiations to "resolve all the issues between us;" according to Hassan Rouhani, the Iranian leadership decided "that we should not negotiate with the U.S.," even though "the Americans had taken the first step."
_	A regular column called "Voices from Prison" highlighted the plight of those behind bars and reinforced the message that good work was being done on the behalf of the so-called "class war prisoners" of America.
_	Air support had been requested against German positions at Calvi Vecchia on 18 October 1943, but the message that the 169th (London) Infantry Brigade had captured the village, delivered by G.I. Joe, arrived just in time to avoid the bombing.
